But you are morbidly obese, right??
How to Start Your Own Adult Toy Store Business Online for Free!
Peanut Butter: The atheist's worst nightmare!
&gt; You are right to call attention to it. Still, I don't see riots incited by Holocaust cartoons. Do you see respectable westerners citing it as an important exercise of free-speech? If not... and if this does not strike you as odd, you missed the point.
**Should the whole world trust *U.S.* Department of Homeland and Security?** * [Election staff convicted in recount rig in Ohio 2004 presidential election that gave President Bush the electoral votes he needed to defeat Democratic Sen. John Kerry](http://www.federalnewsradio.com/index.php?nid=80&amp;sid=1036399) * [Bush signs landmark executive order increasing White House power over federal agencies](http://www.rawstory.com/news/2007/NY_Times_Bush_gives_White_House_0129.html) * [Senator asks Bush to explain signing statement that gives President authority to open mail without warrant](http://www.rawstory.com/news/2007/Senator_asks_Bush_to_explain_signing_0108.html) * [Bush's Signing Statement Dictatorship](http://www.lewrockwell.com/bovard/bovard35.html) * [Bush Moves Toward Martial Law](http://www.informationliberation.com/index.php?id=17432) * [US Attorney General Questions the Right to a Fair Trial](http://baltimorechronicle.com/2007/011907Parry.shtml) * [The White House is replacing U.S. Attorneys throughout the country](http://www.tpmmuckraker.com/archives/002348.php) * [Attorneys for the District of Columbia argue that the Second Amendment right to bear arms applies only to militias, not individuals](http://www.prisonplanet.com/articles/december2006/081206Scope.htm) * [U.S. citizens to be required "clearance" to leave the United States](http://liberalcandy.blogspot.com/2006/11/us-citizens-to-be-required-clearance-to.html) * [An Iron Curtain is Descending on US](http://www.ichblog.eu/content/view/202/52/) * [Cheney: Water torture is OK](http://www.newsobserver.com/114/story/502855.html) * [Bush administration says detainee shouldn't be able to tell attorney how he was tortured in secret CIA prison](http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/wireStory?id=2628673&amp;CMP=OTC-RSSFeeds0312) * [The United States is now prosecuting suspected terrorists on the basis of their intentions, not just their actions](http://www.theatlantic.com/doc/print/200610/waldman-islam) * [Man arrested for saying "I think your policies in Iraq are reprehensible"](http://www.rockymountainnews.com/drmn/local/article/0,1299,DRMN_15_5039230,00.html) * [Letter to the editor prompts visit from Secret Service](http://www.signonsandiego.com/uniontrib/20070122/news_1n22letter.html) * [Civil Liberties Advocates' Worst Fears Realized with Patriot Act Scandal](http://www.inteldaily.com/?c=158&amp;a=1323) * [Activist, anti-Bush lawyer "falls to death" at hotel](http://www.montereyherald.com/mld/montereyherald/news/16326502.htm) * [9,000 Iraqis "disappear" in US custody](http://pressesc.com/01169295066_9000_disappear_us_custody) * [**Abuse and torture by U.S. troops**](http://www.antiwar.com/news/?articleid=8560) * plenty more, regretfully... 
You could also just send the email yourself.  Ex: to text a verizon phone, just email to phonenumber@vtext.com.  It's equally free.
&gt; The population of America has also grown dramatically, and in parallel with, the rising cost of healthcare. The population increase has been 100% due to immigration (we hit ZPG in 1972) and immigrants are less able to pay for services than average. The connection is obvious. Only if you are both ignorant and deluded.  In 1972 you were not getting MRI or CAT scans, your pharmaceutical costs were minimal because the number of available drugs and their efficacy was a fraction of what is available today.  Tell you what, next time you get sick please feel free to ask for the 1972 version of health care...
I'm using SICP and _The Scheme Programming Language_ by Dybvig (3rd edition). One thing I notice: In SICP (I've got the older 1985 edition) you're supposed to define a procedure like so:  ( define (cube x) (* x x x) ) However, in TSPL they would do it like so:  ( define cube (lambda (x) (* x x x))) Is this mostly just stylistic?  Is the 2nd way considered the newer, better way of doing it?    
kljyh
Anyone care to reply with an actual answer, rather than downmods?
She realized that she had a picture of herself with a mullet from 1982 that she was not going to be allowed to destroy...
Why? Because it is my natural right. I came into this world with the right to offend with my speech. No argument can be made against it because my natural right comes from the laws of reason. I was born with that right and I'll die with it. No amount of words or laws you can throw at me will remove that right. It comes "preloaded".  How can you help people to understand the foolishness of religion WITHOUT "offending" them? Need I mention that your username would get you murdered for its use in several countries? Are you not offending Muslims by calling yourself an atheist? You saying that Allah is not GOD! Blasphemer! I demand that you change your nickname to stop offending Muslims, Jews, and Christians! Yes, the slope is that slippery. You either have the use of your right of free speech or you denied your rights. That's what the Chomsky quote means.
Since Saddam was overthrown 655,000 Iraqi's have died. Even with Saddam's mass murders and such his numbers over multiple decades dont even come close. You expect people to believe that Iraqi's, a majority of them, are happy? 655,000 people are dead and how many of them were injured? How many of them had their mothers or siblings blown apart since Saddam left? I'm guessing you could easily have double the numbers in people who's lives have been completely shattered. I'm not even going to answer your last comment, its just the usual conservative spin.   
I'm sure this has been posted before, but it still gets my upvote. This is a very readable introductory calculus textbook which does away with limits and the dreaded epsilon-delta proofs. The "infinitesimal" approach mentioned in the title refers to the use of "non-standard real" or ["hyperreal"](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hyperreal_number) numbers. This is similar to the approach used by Newton, Leibniz, and other calculus pioneers, but it now rests on a rigorous foundation with the development of [non-standard analysis](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Non-standard_analysis) by [Abraham Robinson](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Abraham_Robinson) in the 1960s.
They can actually make money off this. I was talking with Sandy from Meebo about possible business plans.  One thing she told me that I didn't know was that cell providers will pay commission to companies generating text messages like this.
Notice its UK !  DMCA probablly doesn't have the legal power there.
&gt;You are bright, you are creative, you are a free thinker, you are a gay, you are an atheist, you are made to feel unwelcome. I hope all the commas, except the last one, mean *or* not *and*...
Yea - governments that put hoods on their prisoners, tape on their mouths and electrodes on their genitals are much more credible! -  Did you bother to read Terry Jones' article?
&gt; Do you see respectable westerners citing it as an important exercise of free-speech? Holocaust denial is a simple historical lie. The constraints on Holocaust denial are essentially a ban on lying about one issue. Such a ban is bad, but limited in effect. The protection of Islam against mockery represents a broad ban on expressing broad opinions. Islam would enjoy protections that Christianity, atheism, and Judaism do not.   
&gt; Would you buy an OLPC computer for $200? abso-freakin'-lutely 
&gt; Need I mention that your username would get you murdered for its use in several countries? And yet I do not feel compelled to pretend that my choice of username is a valiant expression of free speech. Anyways... I will stop arguing at this point.  Your views now thoroughly expressed just seem thoroughly ludicrous.
&gt; Many dynamic languages these days do have advantages over those two in terms of conciseness and productivity, and claims thereof are relatively uncontroversial. People do see such improvements in the real world. The point of the article is that everybody *says*, *believes* and *repeats* that, but nobody provides hard data and measures. Including you.
one of the world's most popular sites about ABC's LOST, is on the auction block.
Makes sense. They charge the recipient.
But not for the malicious purposes the original poster claims, in fact, they are not allowed to use that function for vandalism at all, only when it pertains to personal information, litgation from individuals who want that information removed, or copyrighted images (all three policies which stemmed from the German lawsuit, not from admins clamouring for more power for censorship).  EDIT: we're talking about a total of what, 16 editors with that ability.
Do you really send a lot of messages that you don't want people to reply to? Free email to SMS relays have been around since SMS was introduced, sounds like you have been wasting some greens for a long time.
You have a pretty healthy outlook on the Bible, not that my "attaboy" is worth much.  I would however, add a couple of clauses to your otherwise accurate assessment. "It is a historical document, it is a guideline for living life **as early Christian leaders think you should**, it is a book of stories with **what we early Christians consider to be** good moral values.  And sometimes it's even **our** rule book." It's a small addition, and maybe too obvious to warrant a mention, but I think it's an improvement.  It makes it a little easier to decide on the correct path when confronted by "Don't kill people, don't steal, and don't pick up sticks on a Saturday."  I have no problem chuckling at that book and thinking, "well, two out of three ain't bad."
Why do you assume all the holocaust cartoons were forms of holocaust denial.  Not the case. Some just compared modern day Israel to the Nazis, and other such shining examples of freedom of speech. Your willingness to explain **away** the clear and blatant racism of the situation does not speak well of you.
Yeah, you do divide the world by color... 1) There are white Muslims, you know? And brown Jews. And Arabic Christians. You lumped them up together.  2) Not all brown Muslims got up in a rancor over this. Some just thought it was an unfunny joke, like I do. You lumped them up together. I see it this way... Mohamed cartoons offend... GREAT!  Holocaust cartoons offend... GREAT! About Europe's crazy laws on the matter, I think you can guess my position.  I often wonder if you are allowed to claim that the 6 million number is too LOW. I always argue for the Supercaust. It is the notion that Hitler killed 60 BILLION Jews in Germany. One number gets you in jail, the other is seen as a joke (in poor taste, no doubt).  That's foolishness.
exobyte: that's only if you send a text message from a cell phone. that's a common practice, if you watch "deal or no deal" they charge $1 per text message to enter to win $10,000 or whatever.
What a load of crap lol. I can't believe conservatives are still trying to deny man made global warming. Just goes to show the great lengths Conservatives will go to spread bullshit. Being Conservative is more like a disease really.
In the scenarios mentioned, the person you are asked to kill will most likely die anyway if you don't kill them. In such a case, the right thing is obvious, and only our silly modern squeamishness makes us stupid. Kill the baby, throw the bastard off the boat.
u can't charge the recipient without the recipient accepting the charges. i've texted myself and i received no extra charges. try collect calling someone, you'll see what i mean.
I wonder how many of those get flu shots every year.
Grant got pretty excited when he saw the LED bulb, or whatever you call it.
Does the DHS have the power to subpoena a key and get it?  DHS can't make laws, or even policy--congress does that.  Yes, airport security is "law," but in court, unless it was passed by congress (or local government), you can't be convicted.
He doesn't leave aside the stdlib, the libraries, the syntactic sugat and the community. He addresses all of that. The article is not perfect, but apparently most of the message is lost to readers who are way too emotionnal.
*laugh* You mean you lost because you have no real points to debate?  Ok. I agree.  You never once refuted any of my premises or conclusions. You simply took small out of context quotes and tried to pretend you were discussing something. You may have fooled yourself, but others reading are not so fooled. As for your username, it is just an example of one of the freedoms that YOU YOURSELF wish to lose. I was just pointing out your hypocrisy.
No, it's if you sent it from the internet, they'll give you a chunk of the $0.05.  I'm just relaying what I've been told.
Hahaha!  Tell us what you really think!
Most cell plans charge for incoming text messages, or at least that is my understanding.
What a typical weenie comment. :)
Just link me to an article that you edited, then the admin maliciously reverted your edit, then deleted the log. Since there's no way to prove otherwise, I'll just take your good word for it. Why not humor me?  Is it because you can't, _because it's never happened to you?_ Can you at least give me an antedote of someone _complaining_ about it? You can't even find one link to a discussion forum, a blog, can't even do a google search for people claiming this (seriously, wikipedia's full of dictators, you're bound to find at least one, you're just too damn lazy).  All it would take is one link to shut me up. Do it.
trooby.org
Then why do I get billed for every text message I receive?  If a company does it to advertise, you can sue, but if I text message a friend, it's different.
whoever told ya, told ya wrong ;)
&gt; the original post just asserted that dynamic languages aren't more productive and asserted that nobody could prove the contrary Please show the paragraph that gave you that impression - so far I've not found such an assertion in "Invasion Of The Dynamic Language Weenies"
They're exactly the same semantically, but the first one is shorter syntactically and arguably easier to read.
Don't confuse Java and the JVM. One is a language, the other is a machine.
Thanks for the information but on my display it still looks the same, I think.  The yellow might be a little darker or something but I can't tell.  The fact that the previous yellow had white all around it might skew my perception.
Define stupid. If failure to adapt isn't part of the meaning, then what is?
I suppose a "win" in Iraq would be having the elected government in power for some length of time and the death rate due to violence drop below a certain level.  I'm not sure if the US has to be in Iraq for this to happen, though.
Luckily mobile operators take SMS spam very seriously (unlike ISPs) because you pay for each message. If they are spamming it won't last long.  And FWIW they are just using the email gateway. There are tons of places to do this. You can also just use regular ol' email. What they are most likely doing is sending a message to each carrier regardless if it's the carrier for that number and just not caring (it will only succeed once, the others just bounce). Probably only the majors too because Helio didn't work.  More sophisticated operations (like Twitter) connect director to the carrier that owns the number and can have two way communication (e.g. you can reply). The advantages come at a price though, you have to pay.
Look... never be rude to anArab
Sorry champ, but no carrier is going to pay for someone throwing anonymous messages up against the email gateway. Perhaps for shortcode type stuff with a direct connection into the carrier, but not for this sort of thing.
I've currently settled on Chicken. It can compile to C, but there's also a decent interpreter. They have a good selection of extra packages (called eggs) which are easily installable with the chicken-setup command. Interestingly, there's a Objective-C bridge available for Chicken, so you could write OS X programs in it. I tried DrScheme, but I didn't like it. Sure, there's a debugger, but it's limited: no breakpoints, no interactive stack analysis. Also, I found it annoying that the interactive window was cleared every time the code was run.  They do have a good repository of packages, but I found some bit rot, and it's hard to determine how old a package is. I also looked at Gambit-C, but it looked like I'd have to chase down Scheme code by myself for some things, and I didn't want to do that. I've become too spoiled by package management tools (PyPI for Python, GODI for O'Caml, etc.) that systems without such support seem quaint :-) Same goes for Bigloo. [Snow](http://snow.iro.umontreal.ca/) will probably be good for packages, but it's still in its infancy.
How the Europeans see themselves:   The most sophisticated group of people on the planet. How America sees them:  A bunch of cheese eating whiners. How they really are:  Basically the same as Americans with a few minor differences.
The first picture is from a heroin elapse not a meth one.
Have him burn a flag and shout "death to America!" and there you have a stereotype of how America views Middle eastern countries
That's perl. Try it yourself: $ perl -e 'print "@{[{}]}\n"'
Actually, this brings up an interesting point: what constitutes victory and what constitutes failure in Iraq have only loosely been defined. The only measures we have to judge the status in Iraq are US/British deaths, Iraqi deaths, the current state of the Iraqi government, and I suppose number of troops stationed there. Well, the one other is that the civil war that was eminent a while ago never happened.
By having text messaging active on your account you are accepting the charges. You can of course opt out of text messaging and rest easy. But because the recipient is paying the mobile carriers are very careful about spam. Verizon has won several lawsuits against spammers and in general all US operators have done a great job in keeping spam off their networks. I don't think I've even gotten one.
It's over 300 pages, so I would use more than a night to read this, but good luck with that.
Don't, then
Nice try, but very weak april fools joke.
DrScheme is very nice, if a bit big and slow. I had to buy more RAM for my computer to use it! (To be fair, at the time I had a modest 512MB, but I'll leave you to draw your own conclusions.)
A color map would've been nice.
You're talking to the CTO of a healthcare company.  What's your qualification?
s/Europeans/French
ずいぶん否定的なアドバイスのようだけれども、浮わついたビジネスプランをもてあそんでる起業家ワナビーに釘を刺す、という視点では的確ではなかろうか。  ただ、視点があくまで経営側なので、ハッカーによる技術スタートアップにはあまり役に立たなさそう。 弾さんがrebuttalを書いているけど( http://blog.livedoor.jp/dankogai/archives/50798905.html )、こちらの方は「起業」を狭義のstartupだけじゃなくてsmall businessを含めた字義通り「業を起こす」方でとらえてて、ターゲットオーディエンスが噛み合ってないって感じ。
Gravity is the result of energy attracting energy. All matter is energy. Energy is consciousness. All consciousness seeks to unite and become one. The oneness nature of the universe is what causes everything to be held together as a single whole.
lies and propoganda (goes off to change shirt)
It afflicts 50% of the population - and the other 50% suffers for it. Now, at last, hope is in sight...
The "Claim: Reduced Code Volume Increases Development Speed" and the "Claim: You Can Assess Productivity By Feel" section. The rest comes from his claim that nobody has done measurements, which isn't true.
You're calling me lazy because I refuse to do the research for you that you don't want to get off your lazy ass and do yourself? I already told you that I don't care what you believe. If you want to believe that history pages contain the entire history of the page and no one ever deletes anything from them, fine, see if I care. You'll just sound ridiculous to everyone that knows otherwise, that's all.
This post (along with most of the other impeachment posts on here) was knocked down immediately despite a majority support for impeachment. Try voting for it, and watch your vote instantaneously be nullified upon refreshing the page. Are neocon hackers at work? Majority Support: http://www.afterdowningstreet.org/node/14897
We just lack the leader who can give us the hope of overturning this massive institution.  Times like these are when heroes are born, we have at least a page in history books to look forward to filling.
"Last Monday Rep. Danny Davis (D-IL 7th) stated to Pledge to Impeach spokesman Anthony St. Martin and independent reporter Jay Marx that though he currently defers to "leadership" on the issue of impeachment he would be compelled to represent his constituency if a Citizen's Petition calling for the impeachment of George W. Bush came from his district. When word of Rep. Davis’ willingness to part from leader Nancy Pelosi (D-CA 8th)’s insistence that impeachment be “off the table” was relayed to Rep. Diane Watson (D-CA 33rd)’s Chief of Staff, Jim Clarke, Mr. Clarke replied, also guardedly, but with certainty, that Rep. Watson would also represent such a petition coming from her constituency. Clarke even went as far as speaking for Rep. Conyers (D-MI 14th), whom he said would respond similarly to such a petition if it arrived with at least 1% of the district’s support. In other words, impeachment is just 6,500 petition signatures away from the floor of Congress. It must be conveyed here, that Mr. St. Martin observed a prevailing tension or even fear in the eyes of some who work in the House Office Buildings. His feeling that those Members opposed to this administration have been locked up and suppressed to the point that they find no sense to bringing their own bill for impeachment, only to be defeated and further isolated, or worse. However, the statements of Mr. Davis and Clarke can be seen as a plea for help; that if given the chance to bring a citizen’s petition, these Members could claim that they have no choice but to fulfill their duty of office and bring it to the floor. As ironic as it may seem, WE must not let THEM down. The Pledge to Impeach campaign has immediately taken it on to respond to these Member’s ovations by seeking out every political group or club that has been collecting petition signatures for impeachment and pairing them up with Congresspersons who make the same commitment to represent that petition on the floor. With special focus on, but not limited to the  districts of Davis, Watson, and Conyers, we will need our own coalition of citizens and impeachment groups willing to work together to bring our maligned Representatives what they need to fight for this greatest of causes. We may not have the same opportunity once war breaks out in Iran. We must act now. We must act together. And we must not fail. Contact us ASAP and join the Coalition of the Willing to Oppose Bush/Cheney. Pledgetoimpeach.org"
I never said anything about a majority. The blog is supposed to be written by two highly educated guys (dentists I think). Just two people. They are now getting paid to blog. Sounds like a pretty good gig, they are doing well for themselves. Just like anywhere else you are going to hear differing opinions, read some blogs from the US and it sounds like the sky is falling and read others and it sounds like heaven. The truth is usually somewhere in-between. All I'm saying is it can definitely be real, there have to be a few optimists in a country of millions of people.
And it will go further into debt once the entire fleet is stolen. I mean c'mon, those are *Porsches*.
I'm talking about the text messages that cost $1.00 to send. normal text messaging fees do apply (i.e. receiving a message and getting charged ten cents), since that is what you agreed to. My point is basically that no one is going to get charged extra for using this web tool since you don't have to agree to any extra fees anywhere.
Unoriginal.  Unartistic.  Unfunny. All you Europeans can crawl down off your high horses and kiss my American ass.  All your countries can do is whine and complain.
you're the one making the claim, the onus of burden is on you. besides, you're the one who cleverly pointed out that you can't prove something by finding evidence that doesn't exist.
My, how your story has changed from the completely unqualified "You can always check the history logs, which show you every correction ever made, why it was made, and who made it."
This mockery of an article or opinion piece or whatever it is proves just what a lot of Redditors really think about good, evil, and the battle to save freedom. How does something as asinine as this get 493 points? Please.
Good luck with that...
I wouldn't doubt that sendurtext is just a frontend to something like this.
Quite literally, in the case of YouTube.
I shake my head in utter pity for you. Reddit is the place to come when one wants to argue with dim-witted high-schoolers--you, my friend, are proof positive of that.
Yes of course. It all makes sense now, you lack a Leader who can Save you. Like Adolf provided to the Third Reich?
I agree. I can see why the system you propose wouldn't work for true emergencies (where people come in unconscious or with mild-altering head injuries, or bleeding to death), but in cases like the one described, it makes a lot of sense.
Are you of the view that bending the truth is vastly different than outright telling a lie? You are not seriously suggesting that the majority of muslims are white, and the majority of jews are dark-skinned. Anyways... my visit to the little high-school known as reddit has ended for the day.  My debate-partners are getting dumber by the second, and it stopped being amusing several minutes ago.
The comments in the original reddit entry are pretty revealing too. Weenies lurk there. ;)
*nod*  I understand. Headlines will always be "sensational" on any social voting site. But I don't think that it is as slanted as you seem to feel. Let's take apart the headline.... &gt; U.N. to World:  A UN resolution is certainly that... &gt; Superstition  This is a bit inflamatory... But it gets the point across quickly. The title says that we will be talking about religion, (given the context that the world "superstition" has on reddit.) It leads us to think that we will be dealing with the bad side of religion in the article, the superstitious rituals, rules, crazy morals that religious people hold. (as opposed to the good things people do in the name of religion like helping the homeless and feeding the poor, etc) &gt; Is More Important Than  In the article, the leftmost item will triumph over the rightmost item. &gt;Free Speech. No debating that part. It is about speech. And we find in the article a UN resolution where religious sensibilities were triumphing over speech rights. So it is sensational, but not as much as you seemed to claim. That's why I responded. As for the previous breakdown that you replied too, I don't think I've created that much of a straw man. You know full well that the people who drafted that resolution feel exactly what I have inferred from their words. I guess I see it as sinister because while the UN currently has no teeth now, it may not be that way forever. It is a legal body. Propaganda does work, so I think it is best to stop it when it gets started. An ounce of prevention is worth a pound of cure.
please give a warning in the headline that you are linking to multimedia. something like: "new " Morgellons disease connected to nanotechnology? (mp3) will suffice.
Great film, thanks. But I object that they call the idea "very popular" while London's name is on the screen. The treatment of cyclists in London compared to most other western European capitals is of criminal negligence.
Yeah, it's easy to jump ship when it's sinking.  What is so enormously different now than around the time of the 2004 election? (other than Bush's approval rating.)  This guy's whole job is about image, and right now he's just trying to save his own skin.
The Internets - A great place for men to anonymously critique every aspect of a woman's body.
Good point, good link.
That's awful and gives me a headache.  Try it with better contrast and less intensity though and it's almost pleasant:  body { color: #030; background-color: #FFD; } 
"They are not stopping traffic or waving picket signs: a group of concerned peaceniks from the Brunswick area have found another means of change. According to the rules of the US House of Representatives, any state legislature can present a resolution to impeach the president. Deborah Gordan and Stan Lofalia of MaineImpeach.org hope Maine will be the first state to do so, though similar efforts are under way in several other states. The group of artists and activists has collected 3600 signatures on a petition to US representatives Michael Michaud and Tom Allen, as well as to state lawmakers, hoping to push any or all of them toward seeking impeachment. Organizers say they want to collect 10,000 signatures before formally submitting them to Michaud, Allen, and others."
Your post: &gt;No you can't. Administrators regularly delete shit from the logs that they don't want people to see. removing personal information that can be used for cyber bullying is a little different than censorship. or were you talking about this particular detail to begin with? which seems odd considering this is a thread about corrections made on wikipedia.   EDIT: because i find it hard to believe that there is any encyclopedic merit in your private phone number appearing in an article about diet and exercise.
Of course, there was Ancient Egyptian... http://www.geocities.com/TimesSquare/Alley/4482/AEloans.html
This is truly the disgusting side of reddit. Justifying the capture of non-hostile military personnel is plain horrible. Throughout history nations have constantly trespassed into territorial waters with nations they are not at war with. At the least they should have been given the option to leave, fire a few warning shots and so on. And then to parade them on camera? Release those obviously fake "letters" home? How could anyone even start to defend it? And to use the faulty logic that the Bush administration used horrible tactics as well? Some of you fucking disgust me, maybe your memory is too short but how exactly did Bush justify torture? By stating that the other side was deplorable, they were worse so we have to lower ourselves or we wont win! And here you all are, following the Bush doctrine. Fucking pathetic.
The first slide seems to summarize how Bush sees himself.
As opposed to the nearly perfect shut out achieved by your contributions to date. 
guess what, the nazis defending against the invading forces were still nazis. taliban harbored bin laden so they were terrorists. end of story.
Bored on a Saturday afternoon.....
Actually you're understating the true costs associated with industrial farming (even if you exclude "enviromental costs"). Farming is a massively subsidizes industry. Its not cheaper to "hire a dozen laborers" mainly because TAXES defray the cost of the alternatives.
We don't like to have eye contact 'cos it freaks us out! - we see to much - and presume too much is seen.
reddit trial
People who submit only theoildrum.com articles with the suffix oose:  faloose  profgoose  kaboose  vamoose  aloose
US has already lost in Iraq, Afghanistan, Somalia .... Viet Nam ... so why not start another faliure?
So, they're accused of "swapping" older images in. Is there any evidence that they used the newer imagery at one point? 
Really? That's your argument after claiming you were not going to reply? An ad hominem? You couldn't get away with that in middle-school debate, much less Highschool debate. So be careful about your accusations of "dim-witted" and "high-school", people may see that you are revealing much about yourself. Try again without an ad-hominem. Pick a point I made, try to refute it. Or is reddit the place where you come when YOU get in a mood to troll?
&gt; I think that benchmark is rather unfair Don't get me started on [not fair](http://shootout.alioth.debian.org/gp4/faq.php#fable) :-) Instead ask - what do we *really* mean by concurrency, and do "cheap-concurrency" and "chameneos" **require** programs that we would consider *really* concurrent?
I think that's the dumbest answer you could have given...  And nice going invoking Godwins law, a little earlier than I would have expected but since you are just spouting the Faux News rhetoric and have sloppy thinking I shouldn't be so surprised...
obviously a P.R. job put out by clever prison rapists.
For a great source of serial adapters, visit us….. 
so no counter point - just a personal attack? don't cut and run so early, it's emasculating. you're better than that.
I'm entirely in favor of non-monogamous behavior for those individuals who choose that path. If one has entered into a relationship with a promise and understanding of sexual fidelity, however, then "cheating" or "adultery" are indeed unethical breaches of that relationship and deserving of scorn. 
Tell them to call the NSA.
This is stupid beyond belief. As if being a racist were even 1/1000th as bad as being an American.
Amateurs.. Look how the pros do it! http://eepybird.com/dcm1.html  http://eepybird.com/exp214.html Edit:   Background Info: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mentos_eruption
WTF? Why would they want to do that? Asian skin looks great.
Does anyone know the song playing in the background during the second half of this video?  I know I've heard it before, and it is driving me crazy not being able to remember.
You might have noticed by now (especially since I've said it over and over) that I'm not really interested in proving anything to you. If the confirmation from multiple people on this thread doesn't convince you, confirmation from other people won't help you either. Here's someone else complaining about administrators doing a lot more than just deleting entries from the history: http://meta.wikimedia.org/w/index.php?title=Talk:Wikipedia_vandalism&amp;oldid=517571#vandal_.3D.3D_information_about_vandalism_used_as_pretext_for_censorship_by_administrators. That took me about a whole 30 seconds to find. If you want more, do your own research. If not, believe whatever the hell you want, and continue sounding ridiculous to people that know better.
* PLT Scheme is an umbrella name for the rest.  * mzscheme names two things: the interpreter and a language  * mred is the mzscheme interpreter + the GUI toolkit compiled in  * DrScheme is the IDE, a mred application written in mzscheme That's how I understand it...
This blog primarily chronicles my experiences dealing with our more unusual library patrons, who my coworkers and I regularly refer to as our, "Irregulars," and the bizarre things that happen on a regular basis where I work.
&gt;an inability of much of the Moslem world to tolerate a mild insult I don't know- "much of the Moslem world"?  I think the cartoons set off the lunatic fringe.  Religious zealots have remarkably little in the way of a sense of humor- and that goes for every religion's zealots, not just Muslims.  My belief is that most Muslims are normal humans who do not respond to cartoons by burning down buildings or delivering death threats to strangers.  Transpose the situation to the U.S.- you've got a small number of Christians who will firebomb abortion clinics; you've got a statistically significant number who like the idea of a constitutional amendment to prevent gay marriage; and you've got a large number who'd be pretty humorless about a cartoon in a newspaper poking a little harmless fun at Jesus.  I can easily imagine such a cartoon being hastily removed and profusely apologized for, freedom of speech notwithstanding. And no, of course we shouldn't institutionalize respect for that kind of oversensitivity.  But the resolution talks about trying to prevent religiously- and racially-motivated violence.  I think it'd be okay to institutionalize an intolerance for religiously- and racially-motivated violence.
I *am* a Jew, and I never really got offended about Holocaust cartoons.  None of the Jews I know got all that offended.  Did we like that a Holocaust denier was in trouble?  Oh, of course.  But (since most of us are American Jews) we also understand the necessity of freedom of speech. The rational argument for outlawing Holocaust denial is that we outlaw slander: lying about plain facts to defame another.  In the view of many Jews, Holocaust denial is a form of slander.  I do not agree with that view, since in my opinion Holocaust denial insults nobody but the denier.
I wish Baskerville were a web font.
this is funny. i like how it keeps getting longer. voted up, i say! voted up indeed!
I bet someone was watching his ass for the next few weeks when he was sleeping.
Yeah, there were 3 outliers on the chart. Georgia moved down 6 spaces, Delaware moved up 7 and LA moved down 8. The rest moved a maximum of 3 places. Did all the criminals move from New Orleans to Delaware after the hurricane?
&gt;Morally, you can say whatever you like (unless you are inciting people to riot or commit crimes). Actually, that's the definition of the legal right to free speech.  The moral right to free speech includes inciting people to commit any moral act, including rioting and crime as appropriate.
Two words: GEORGE ZIMMER.
I can understand why. I'd have to scratch out many sections of the Physical Anthropology textbook from the university course I took last year due to recent revisions, like interbreeding with neandertals, primate use of tools, extinction of dinosaurs, age of mammals, hybridization generating species, etc. etc.  It's hard to accept definitions as definite which change every year. Or is that "evolve" every year?
I mean that cars should not drive along or park on the sidewalk as they do here frequently.
how about throwing a football at a bear, it causes it to choke? maybe it only works in the playoffs.
Wait, this wasn't US, was it?
I wouldn't go as far as "endless," but it should provide some interesting films for the future if the camera can be made accessible to the public cheaply.
Because we all know only Coke brand products will work with this prank.
You do need exactly one kernel thread per CPU to take advantage of multiple CPUs.
That's science for you. If you want rigid, unchanging beliefs, then you want religion.
&gt; So it is sensational, but not as much as you seemed to claim. That's why I responded. Thank you for you lucid explanation.  I cop to picking a eye-catching title because I wanted this article to be seen and discussed on Reddit.   A mere description of the content would have been long and boring and ignored. But as you've pointed out, while the title is provocative, it's not really off the mark.
I don't think that's THE solution if you want to meet Mr./Mrs. right ... but I think the stigma attached to online dating is also on it's way out.
Dr. Judy J Johnson, Dentist New York, NY is the founder and principal dentist behind Dental Visits Centers for Cosmetic Dentistry. Dental Visits Centers for Cosmetic Dentistry accepts dental insurance as payment for most dental care, e.g. braces, dentures, root canals, dental fillings, bad breath, etc, teeth whitening is the exception, that’s only done by New York cosmetic dentists. Since 1981, Dr. Johnson has demonstrated excellence in the art and science of making over beautiful smiles. She is a graduate of the College of Dentistry at Howard University of Washington’s District of Columbia prestigious for Advance Dental Studies and is a sought-out speaker at motivational conferences nationwide. Presently she is the managing director of Dentistry at Dental Visits Centers for Cosmetic Dentistry, which is headquartered and located at 30 East 40th Street, Suite 604 in New York City, New York 10016.
nope.  but without US money and US power, it's most likely that the british navy would be nowhere near Iran.
You said...  &gt;smug whites having a laugh at stuff that deeply offends the sensibilities of millions of non-whites And I claimed that proved you lumped people together by race. I claimed this because the topic under discussion was religion and immediately you brought in race. Since topic under discussion was if making fun of someone's religion was a natural right then obviously race was not germane to the discussion. But you had your agenda to push, so you jumped right in. &gt;Anyways... my visit to the little high-school known as reddit has ended for the day. My debate-partners are getting dumber by the second, and it stopped being amusing several minutes ago. Well, as it seems as if you can only use ad hominems as a debate tactic thus it isn't surprising that you find these discussions frustrating. Losing all the time does suck. Go enjoy the rest of your day and let the adults do the talking. Or better yet, try to make a point about the discussion at hand...  Why is freedom of speech not a natural right in your worldview? How can you justify the curtailment of rights to protect people from "emotional distress"?
Zope is probably a better example, especially since Twisted uses its interfaces package. (But Twisted is still awesome.)
I just want a monkey.
Cute, so my final "counterpoint", by your argument the U.S. should also be considered terrorists since they armed and supplied bin Laden and his group of merry men...
The majority of Jews (since the majority now live in M'dinat Yisrael) *are* at least partly "brown".  You can expect more to be "brown" as Sfardi and Mizrachi Jews marry Ashkenazi Jews.  Oh, and as Jews have Jewish children without Cossacks raping them every so often.
old
Press play on the video to watch the highlights
"save me some greens?" Who talks like that?
AFLAK!
Again, why is it that the government-only program works so well, while the government/corporate program sucks? Why don't you take a break from telling me what I do and don't understand and take a stab at that question? The fact of the matter is that this is supply-side economics and supply-side has never worked -- it's a faith-based economic policy. To go back to the article, the gap between rich and poor is the widest it's been since before the depression.
Evolution? "Stupid" red states? I'm a blue voter in a red state, and few of those commenting on it know much about it. Divisiveness is so unnecessary and undeserved. Read Eric Schlosser's book Fast Food Nation and you can see how Big Business has screwed these people over. As a native of Southwest Kansas, a liberal democrat, it's easy to see how it happened. For those of you who have no sympathy, remember when these people aren't making your food YOU ARE AT THE MERCY OF BIG BUSINESS and they will charge you whatever the hell they want to for food. Sitting in a city apartment, who feeds you? Enchanted jars and boxes, that's who. If that goes away, then where are you? You are connected to these people in a deeper sense than you realize. So, do you think that driving around in a car means you've done real investigative reporting? By the way, Kansans are friendly people, and parochialness isn't a crime.
&gt; shorter wavelength light will make sharper images, so contrast in the blue part of the spectrum (green on yellow) makes sense Remember that blue-sensitive cone density in the retina is *way* lower than for red and green ones.
On a Mac you can press Ctrl-Opt-Apple-8 to invert the screen colors. I am sure Windows and Linux can do the same thing. It makes reading text easier and is easy to reverse when looking at pictures.
And occasionally condemn something a 1st World country did in the U.N.  You have to give them their willingness to pass non-binding resolutions in favor of peace, justice, morality, culture, sport, and the obliteration of all other life-forms.
I haven't seen where there was a distance stated, so I'm not sure about the 12 miles.  They were acting under UN authority to search for weapons (mainly from Iran) that were being shipped to Iraq probably to be used to kill innocent civilians.  Actually, Iran is lucky the Brits were passive.  Don't be so...
Thats interesting because I have seen many other surveys giving different results.
Evolution? "Stupid" red states? I'm a blue voter in a red state, and few of those commenting on it know much about it. Divisiveness is so unnecessary and undeserved. Read Eric Schlosser's book Fast Food Nation and you can see how Big Business has screwed these people over. As a native of Southwest Kansas, a liberal democrat, it's easy to see how it happened. For those of you who have no sympathy, remember when these people aren't making your food YOU ARE AT THE MERCY OF BIG BUSINESS and they will charge you whatever the hell they want to for food. Sitting in a city apartment, who feeds you? Enchanted jars and boxes, that's who. If that goes away, then where are you? You are connected to these people in a deeper sense than you realize. So, do you think that driving around in a car means you've done real investigative reporting? By the way, Kansans are friendly people, and parochialness isn't a crime. 
The new wall has little to do, directly, with Israeli-Arabs.  Israel isn't literally putting a little wall around each Israeli-Arab.  Even if your initial point about apartheid is fair.
i understand the concept behind that angle, but it really doesn't hold up in reality. the americans and russians were allies in WWII and look what happened there as time passed. the US supported the mujahadin when they were fighting the communists. when they morpehd into the islamist taliban they hit the reset button. 911 made them fair game, and rightly so.
The Argentine mullet ("corte cubano", or Cuban haircut, literally) is a mystery of the highest sort. Do not question it or try to understand it (I certainly don't).
Oh OK, I understand now.  Iran is the angel, and the US (Bush) is the devil.
He's being sarcastic (I hope)
Here's a [list of email-to-SMS gateways by provider](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/SMS_gateways#Carrier_Gateways).
Yeah I could have worded that better. ;) I just put the caveat in to avoid the breakdown of the debate into the usual "fire in a theater" style that you often find on the internet. Obviously, it is illegal in China to say that everyone has the natural right of free speech, but it would be someone's moral right to go out and say so. The practical matter is that you would be shot for doing so. I just think it is sad to see people who want to throw away the rights they already have. Thanks for your comments, both here and below!
So are you going to apologize if they all come safe and sound and say their treatment was good? I get the feeling you won't.
Mr Mike, I'm sure you wouldn't mind if these things were tested on you in a public venue to see if they hurt or not. Just because you are guilty of nothing is no reason not to torture you.  I think you will enjoy waterboarding. I hear that it is almost as much fun as surfing.  Torture isn't standing up to tyranny.  It is tyranny.
Methinks 'tis a suboptimal page format. I had to use Firefox's text size add-in to increase the font size three times and use Paragrasp to highlight each paragraph so that the otherwise gray-on-black type was readable...
Could be, i dont believe the phone companies hand out cash like that, but if you think about it it would be worth it for them. They charge for any text, sent or recvd, unless the person is unlimited then they are gonna get charged.
His mail is listed on the bottom of the page. He invites comments.
Menopause.
Not entirely true. Many kinds of produce picked by immigrant labor in the US are picked by Machine in Australia. Threshing wheat by hand just doesn't work very well. Picking lettuce is a  bit more difficult to automate. In the US, cheap immigrant labor wins over the capital costs of buying specialized harvesters. Plus, if you hired the labor as 'real' employees, I'd bet it still is a lot more expensive than buying the proper hardware, at least it is for wheat where you can harvest a field in a fraction of the time.   
How can you be absolutely sure that that was what the Iranians  said? I mean it's the media man. Surely you don't trust the media anymore? Surely? 
Not to mention drug dealers.
"The latest NEWSWEEK poll shows that 91 percent of American adults surveyed believe in God—and nearly half reject the theory of evolution. " Oh my f**king god.  Is this an Onion piece.  There is no way that 9% of American are level-headed and clear thinking. My head is going to explode.  Do they just poll 100 people and call it a day. We should send letters to msnbc that they are full of s**t.  Hopefully, we can get about 40 million letters and that would negate their poll data.
Exactly, when you don't have to work 10 hours a day scrounging for a meal, you can spend time learning to knap flint, or cast bronze, etc. Your skill then 'pays' for the farmer doing the work of feeding you, and ideally, your inventions make him more efficient as well.
Yes
I just want a t-shirt.
#Maybe redditors just don't like the ALL CAPS TITLE, I know I don't.
Rosie O'Donnell asks 30 million ABC viewers:What do you have to do to get Impeached in this country?
I think the President and Rove (like Clinton) should just say F*** off!  Since these attorneys worked at the pleasure of the President, they could be fired at any time.  Remember President Clinton did this.  Where was the witch hunt then?  This is just partisan politics that has become the norm, so the politicians don't have to do the job they are elected to do.  
Snarky rejoinder!
That'll surely make for a fun trick-or-treating with the kids! I'd bet even cats would get scared of that one.
wait till every airport has those and the ads are selling tampons with extra long strings or something.
You use hungarian notation? :-P
Of course he's being sarcastic, but I run into people who think that work is inherently good all the time. Think of all the times someone said that something was "good for the economy" because it would "create jobs". Even worse is "good for the local economy". As if it mattered how many hairdressers and coffee shops there are. Coffee I can drink at home. Nuclear power plants, steel mills and cement kilns are not things I can make in my garage. And even if I could make these things in my garage, it would be cheaper to buy them from an industrial plant. Which is not true for making coffee myself.
nope, you partisan hack.   all governments are inherently evil.  that, for example, is why the founding fathers wrote the constitution - to limit power. the point is simple...when you play with fire, eventually you get burned.  The founders warned us of the dangers of foreign entanglements.  Whether or not Britain, or Iran, or anyone is right or wrong in this situation is not the point. The fact is this - when you meddle in the affairs of other countries, you're going to find yourself in very difficult or bad situations.  and, that's just what happened here.
Due to the large number of people in private prisons due to the drug war, the prison lobby in the US is vastly more powerful than those in other nations. Drug laws are also significantly more draconian, and a large part of the reason drug laws aren't more liberal in other nations is that foreigners are a bunch of pussies just waiting to bend over for the US gov't.
Canadian Liberal party activists are filing bogus DMCA copyright infringement complaints to censor pro-conservative videos.
Us Europeans here in Australia read Reddit too, you know (and speak better English than the rest of you, thank you very much) and we happen to know that the cartoon presented here is completely and utterly correct in every particular.
UN authority?  oh, that makes sense, you must be some sort of communist who believes in a world governing body.  screw the u.n.
Get a blow job in oval office.
That's circular reasoning. The drug laws are more draconian because of the prison industry. The prison industry is so powerful because of the drug laws. It's not good enough. It doesn't explain why some nations don't enter into this vicious cycle, nor why other nations break it, nor why some nations enter it yet seem immune to it. You know what *does* explain it? That Americans is a grievously savage child-race. That they're a third-world country that won the lottery and gets to rule the world by happenstance.
Needs more violence, and less reticence about the ever living Jesus.
This article is just a lot of noise that could have been reduced to just one or two paragraphs. It's wordy, repetitive description of the surface details with no examination of the underlying causes of the phenomenon.   What is lacking is exactly what you have provided: an explanation for what's going on. The article should have cut down on the descriptions and added many more paragraphs elaborating on your explanation. As it is now, it's pointless, a badly drawn sketch.
&gt;What if someone did a comic dealing with how Middle East people see themselves vs. how others saw them and all it did was play into popular stereotypes for a cheap laugh? You mean like stereotypical Middle East terrorists in every American movie and TV show or more like all the "French" jokes in every American media?
This post (along with most of the other impeachment posts on here) was knocked down immediately despite a majority support for impeachment. Try voting for it, and watch your vote instantaneously be nullified upon refreshing the page. Are neocon hackers at work? Majority Support: http://www.afterdowningstreet.org/node/14897
Snide riposte!
There is nothing you can express in Ruby or Perl, that you can't do in any turing complete language. The question is how difficult it is to express.
Please read the post you are replying to for a detailed answer to your question.
Well, when the facts don't support your agenda what else can you do?
And lie about it.
Well should you really be bicycling at -10*c anyway? Who would do that? You'd be sliding around everywhere, while frozen and wet.
50% of the population have below average IQ, so this is about right
I've dug into the cholesterol contrarian's claims, and I've talked with people who have actually data-mined the Framingham Heart Study.  The contrarians, much like the second hand smoke skeptics and global warming deniers, form a self-reinforcing echo chamber that has swamped sound science on the Internet.  However, talk to any physician, nutritionist, or university researcher and you get a completely different picture. I don't trust statins.  I control my cholesterol through exercise, limited saturated fat and zero trans fat intake.  Physicians still talk up diet and exercise, but most people would rather take a magic pill. Regarding your dismissal of Carroll as a philosopher, philosophers often understand the process of science better than scientists.  Thomas Kuhn and Karl Popper were mere philosopers.  Carroll's area of study is critical thinking. 
1. You do not understand why Yasukuni was built.  It was a fascist effort at glorifying war and state Shinto.  In that manner it was and remains a potent symbol of the military imperialism of the day; there is no comparison to Arlington. 2.  Your description of the far-right is off the mark.  They are quite powerful as evidenced by their strangle-hold on politics as well as their alliance with the Yakuza and the police.  Ordinary citizens are frightened by them in periodic displays of power:  when Abe became Prime Minister the black buses and vans were out in full force broadcasting messages from their loudspeakers to the public, downtown in broad daylight.   3.  I studied Japanese politics at a Japanese university and have lived here for almost ten years.  The move to the right here in Japan is palpable and is of serious concern to anybody who would like to see democracy take root here.  The political process here is rancid...we are in the midst of going through the motions of another election just now.
You could do [all of this](http://www.democrats.com/impeachment-reasons).  Oh, wait...none of that will get you impeached.
Agreed.  While most of the issues of copyright infringement on YouTube have related to commercial disputes, it is going to be really interesting when people start using the DMCA to shut down debate on political/moral issues.
And yet there are still people in this world who think that capitalism is a stupid idea and that socialism will bring about a utopia.
ok, this may be the best comment ever on reddit.
Actually not, I may have mistakenly taken you for someone who may have let that go as "OH the UN, then OK".  I agree the UN is BS.  All the same, do you support Iran?
It is however injecting (implicitly strong) personal opinion on a topic that by itself would already bring up in a forum like this -- rather arrogant on your part, no?  Downmod for crap title; interesting piece of news though.
Not one word of argumentation. Just statement of opinion.  Way to go, you must be a Neocon.
i bet they didn't think of that huh? their little resolution would ban their religion. talk about a catch 22.
that was cool love ur site. go jas
Well maybe the sketch was all he wanted to convey.  The reasons can be debated but the observations is hard to deny.   I prefer someone describe a situation rather than starting by offering a "solution" to something that might not need to be fixed.
Just to correct the statement, "it is car drivers that pay for roads, at least in the U.S. through gas taxes," most non-highway roads are paid for via sales and property taxes, which cyclists and non-cyclists pay. http://mobikefed.org/2003/06/removing-barriers-to-bicycle-and.php
&gt;  16\. They frequently block feelings of shame through compulsive behaviors like workaholism, eating disorders, shopping, substance abuse, __list making__ or gambling. This is a list, right? And it was, like, made by somebody, I assume?
On the same edu site, a different article comes with different color schemes: http://hubel.sfasu.edu/research/survreslts.html White on blue used to be a favourite of such studies some 20 years ago - remember the Norton Commander (father of Midnight Commander) and WP5 for dos.
You can easily turn off "custom" web site styling in both Opera and Firefox/Mozilla.
Autem nemine intelligente ad faciem tuam adspiciente facebis. (No one will understand you, and they will stare at you)
and that list basically excludes all the muslim on muslim terror attacks in iraq the past few years. statistically speaking, islam has a monopoly on terrorism.
I live in a rural wasteland.  Let me tell you:  I'd rather live in an urban wasteland than be surrounded by ignorant, bigoted, Christian fundamentalists who hate gays, believe President Bush is always right, and think the rapture is just around the corner.  I'm counting the days until I get out of here.
[White House Celebrates Fifth Straight Year Without Oral Sex](http://www.theonion.com/content/node/43901)
I'm just curious. I assume (correct me if I'm wrong) that not every street has separated lanes for bikes. So what happens if you have to go from a separated lane to a road where you have to ride with cars?
How do you know?
How could they not?
You may kick us down from our high horses, you may force our faces against your fat asses. But does that change our view of you as loud-mouthed gun toting yahoos?
I'd seriously like to hear your reasons for _still_ using MSIE? (Opera and Firefox have that option. If I parse your will right)
Ugh.
Though if the theories change back and forth year after year, that would be evidence of politics, not science at all.
Uh, no.  Their fundamentalism and hate came before the Republicans ever exploited it.  Most of these people would still bash gays and non-Christians even if the Republicans never existed.
&gt;Human Rights Watch said the resolution could endanger the basic rights of individuals. Replace "the resolution could" with "islam does" and you're all set.
What have you made that'll still be in use in 100 years?
Cringely wrote this week that filing a false DMCA claim is as bad as stealing copyrighted material. People should start using that.
Todd Bridges of Diff’rent Strokes infamy has become the latest celebrity of that bygone era known as the ‘80’s to succumb to the new Hollywood trend. Non-death.  
The catch? This random company gets a random database of cell phone numbers that may be on the do not call list.
streetsblog.org is a great site for people who would like to know more about building a people friendly instead of car friendly NYC.
You know, I think you're the first guy who said 'justice' and it made me realize it wouldn't have been justice even if it had been rape. Vengence yes, but not justice.
The term you're looking for is premium SMS. It doesn't have great mind share in the US, but is still fairly popular for things like purchasing ringtones. It's the text equivalent of a 1-900 number.  You're right as far as premium SMS is concerned, companies can't bill you without your permission (you have to message them first, although one message can count as signing up and you'll receive future messages that will be billed). Sort of like how a 1-900 number can't call you and charge you, except with the added annoyance of subscriptions.
The article says that Porsche was the lowest bidder. 
stfu cracker
i just want to dance!
The simplest answer might be backlash from regular Reddit users following the recent incident where Reddit's front page was packed with impeachment stories. And ellsmall may be right; all caps title doesn't invite upmods.
and then lie under oath
One word: Cricket. Two more words: Televised Darts
If you want you can just get the whole do not call list from the government, it's a list published for telemarketers. If you call one of the numbers you get in trouble, so they have to give out the information on who not to call. Mobile numbers are already off the calling lists of telemarketers though so you shouldn't have to sign up for the DNC list.
touché.
Good essay. Not what you're thinking. 
Yes, they are the Fadhil brothers who met with Bush in late 2004.  Bush the other day referred to one of their posts as evidence that things in Iraq are looking up, but the White House [took a few hours to acknowledge](http://seattlepi.nwsource.com/opinion/309584_bloged.html)  it was these two.
Developed over 100 years ago and all but lost, these are now produced and sold on the site at www.HorseTrainingResources.com  Jesse Beery developed this pulley breaking bridle to train horses to pick up their feet, stop bad habits, and make training time much more effective.  It frequently on takes a few minutes with this bridle to get your horse to do what you want them to do.
Been to Europe lately? It kind of rocks. Coming home, and to California, was a little painful. Mainly the noisy TVs in all the airport lounges though, so it went away. Oh yes, and people are way more physically attractive there - everywhere I went. It's not that they were beautiful - it was that they weren't 'curvy'.
I knew there was a reason my computers always feel sluggish as they get older! 
What do you mean? Could you please elaborate? Lol!!!
Bulgaria is pimping their ride.
You're a gawd damn commy forinur ain'tcha? Ahh can tell.
Yeah, it can be stored for a week in the fridge if I remember correctly. A lot longer in the freezer. Like on the order of 3 months.
I did not say "because", I said "and", as in "in addition to".
Maybe so few have come out because:  1. Maybe so few are gay  2. It has something about taking a shower in the presence of someone who may not like you checking them out.
&gt;There are 17 Muslim countries in the 47-nation human rights council. Their alliance with China, Cuba, Russia and most of the African members means they can almost always achieve a majority. Why the F do Cuba and "the African members" have a vote the UN?
Why only men ?
Your parents find sex objectionable.
please. hate speech/graffiti directed against race is already a crime. why is that any more deserving of criminal status than speech against religion? For an example of hate crime: http://www.stanforddaily.com/article/2001/4/12/universityResponseToHateGraffitiInadequate Not all speech is free.
Not necessarily.  An IQ of 100 is average, not the median. Say you have 4 people with IQs of 40, 120, 120, and 120.  Their average IQ is 100, but clearly, only 25% have IQs less than average. This is an exaggeration and the opposite can be true, but average and median are NOT the same.
Are you really making that argument? That Israel is there for the good of the Palestinians, because they're better off that way instead of self-governing?
cool
Hahaha!
I might indeed be torn up should great American cities implode, explode, or decay. Much as I'm saddened by many other things lost to time. I'd have loved to have seen one of these small towns in their heyday, or explored the American wilderness when there was still wilderness to explore.  If I find myself caught in the middle of that destruction  through short-sightedness, arrogance, or plain reality-denial, then yes, I'd be stupid and people would be right to label me so. But as much as I might lament the loss of New York City, or San Francisco, or any other city you could name, I sure as hell wouldn't hang around if I thought I'd be unable to make my life there.
Most of what I saw in that video was a great argument against bike lanes. One of the biggest problems with bikes lanes is that they put cyclists in places where drivers don't expect other vehicles to be. The best example is the case of the right turning car. When a car turns right, the driver does not expect another vehicle (a bicycle) to be on his or her right. A partial solution to this is something like the law in California which states that cars must pull in to the bike lane when they make right turns. This allows cyclists to pass the turning cars on the left, where they are not going to be hit. The separated paths they show in the video look like pretty frightening places to ride. Full of runners, walkers, wrong-way cyclists, etc. The name John Forester has been mentioned here before. If you are a cyclist and you have not read his articles, stop reading reddit and go learn something. The best thing you can do to improve your chances of surviving on a bike is to learn to ride in a vehicular manner.
Would you be similarly relieved if you saw Newsweek publish statistics like "68% of respondents said they believed someone could be moral and a negro"? I'm worried about the 26% who said it wasn't possible. Think about it: 26% of people surveyed thought that it was impossible for me to be moral. That's about the most damning insult possible.
Is this a snippet of one of those documentary-type TV shows? Anyone know which one?
&gt; He added, “I do feel a calling of trying to re-establish a level of gentleness in the world.” Jeez - what a wuss ! The Democrats don't need any more fair-weather friend wussies like Dowd. They need some tough talking men of action. It' s precisely this kind of sissy talk that made them lose elections. Like Kerry in the debates - he clearly won all of them, but he didn't really try hard to destroy W. Dowd might have good intentions, but these kinds of statements don't show any strength.   
Looks more like Cthulhu.
Stolen. You can find the original, and a sequel, on [ryanvsdorkman.com](http://www.ryanvsdorkman.com/) Also, they weren't high school kids, and they didn't do it for a class.
factor?
anyone else think of Byron the bulb from Gravity's Rainbow when they read this?
I hope so.
No.
I've spent the past year or so learning lisp and have created a few proof-of-concept products. I'm currently using the express edition of Allegro CL. The only Allegro specific functionality I'm using is Allegro Cache (persistent object database), Aserve (web server) and the built-in Regex package. Due to the high cost of Allegro, I'm trying to see if any other lisp packages would suit my needs. I am currently running Windows, but would be willing to switch if I need to. Any recommendations would be helpful. thanks
Assuming we want to revolt, how are we going to act in a coordinated manner, Richard? No one can go outside and just start "the revolution" by themselves. It's not like I get up every day and decide not to overthrow the government. You act so goddamn cynical and contrarian, but I think you're the most naive person on here.
These numbers have shown themselves to be relatively stable over time.  Do a google search of "percentage of americans who believe in evolution" and you'll find a number of polls over the last few years that have similar results. Perhaps the most frightening item you'll find is [a graph of Western countries ordered by the population's acceptance of evolution](http://news.nationalgeographic.com/news/bigphotos/21329204.html).  The U.S. is at the bottom between Cyprus and Turkey.
Most Americans are not fat.
Orwellian nonsense? Why do you hate America, comrade richardkulisz? Is it our freedom?
Yes, but can you autogenerate a logger for django?
Neither!
This is a great little thing, showing exactly why we are in Iraq. It all make sense now. China...invade you own country! We've got ours.
Yea, old RFK used to bounce like crazy during Redskins games...no video clip though.
I do know a LOT of atheists -- But do I personally know every atheist in America?
So, that means they don't live in Iraq? 
Heh - reminds me of this old joke. As men grow older, they begin to look distinguished - like Sean Connery. Unfortunately, as women grow older, they begin to look like Sean Connery... (  ;-) sorry, couldn't resist !)
April Fools!
So it would appear that Al Gore needs to spend a bit more time tidying up his own ecology...(?) Nevertheless, Al's evidently poor choice in housing doesn't negate the seriousness, or legitimacy, of global warming...
They don't flip backwards and forwards, but we add more knowledge and improve things. The four things you cited above are all areas where the knowledge is being refined. For example, the "age" of mammals is being fine tuned as more DNA samples come through, and better phylogenetic models get used.  This is exactly the same picture for all of the examples you mentioned - we get more data, we get better tools and we see how this refines our understanding. (Yes, I am an evolutionary biologist, so I maybe a bit biased)
[Slowwave](http://slowwave.com) does them, of people's dreams.
lol, my father drives a cayenne.  thats hilarious.
sbcl is the best.
With the exception of a few groups living in extremely marginal environments, all hunter gatherer societies we know of average something like four hours a day of "work."  Interesting to so completely miss the point of Diamond's work.  Why do you think he has written that the adoption of agriculture was the biggest "mistake" our species ever made?
They're not sad, they're just keeping straight faces, probably for better comparison year to year
Ah yes, that's right.
What do you accomplish by posting this comment that couldn't simply be done by voting the article up?
Personally I like PLT Scheme, it's up to date, has all the features you could need/want, and has a lot of very smart people working on/using it. I like Scheme48 also, but recently they seemed to have broken some stuff, Riastradh's SLIME48 no longer works with the newer versions of Scheme48, so you have to use 1.3 if you want SLIME48.
Hahahah that was too funny. I'm gonna crawl through my sink and check stock prices.
haha, that's cool. thanks for the heads up. when that character says. "for great justice!" I couldn't help but laugh.
A few more Iraq blogs: - [Treasure of Baghdad](http://www.baghdadtreasure.blogspot.com/)  - [Baghdad Chronicles](http://blog.aliraqi.org/)  - [hnk's blog](http://iraqigirl.blogspot.com/) [Editor and Publisher take on iraqthemodel cite by GWB](http://www.editorandpublisher.com/eandp/columns/pressingissues_display.jsp?vnu_content_id=1003564636) 
more photos &gt; http://flickr.com/search/?q=china+smog
This poll is BS
She *is* on the way to the gym.  Though the whole idea of driving to the gym seems a little illogical to me.
I thought it was because they are smelly and insist on musking everything around them.
There are actually two types of prostatitis - but wait! What is prostatitis?
That is pretty clever. But what happens if Google decides to shut it down? A large and/or complicated site is likely to find itself up a crick with no paddle.
Yo Mama so fat, she uses a self storage unit as her panties drawer.
Ok, yes, you caught me. Still, I think it is a crime to equate static typing to the languages that most people associate it with.  This is the point I was attempting to highlight. There is no inherent benefit to dynamic typing it just happens to usually bring along other ideas which make the language nice.  This guy's post basically agrees with me, except for the conclusion he makes! So, dynamic languages do turn out to often be nice, but not because fo their type system.  Perhaps it does help - this lax way of typing allows the language designers to ignore such complications as type inference, yet still save the programmer keystrokes. That I got marked down to 0, and you marked up to 5 really makes me wonder about such sites as this.  It seems like there are always irrational, nearly site-wide 'religions'. Even Lambda the Ultimate is guilty.  It's quite bizarre.  And yes, I'm being hypocritical in this case due to my reference to haskell in the above post. Perhaps the problem is that I did not preface my post with "I really like python, much more than other languages."  I figured it was implied - everyone intelligent knows that it is a good language.  I'm arguing that this guy has factual inaccuracies and commits the errors of the article he is condemning. (Wow, did I just critique the critique of the critique of the critique of the critique?!?!)
Wow, that's some really incontrovertible proof there. Did you know that George Lucas has proof that people flew spaceships around and fought lightsaber duels (a long time ago,in a galaxy far, far away)? And check out Paramount's proof that the starship *Enterprise* went on a five-year mission... 
This guy is missing the point. It doesn't behoove a little girl to come up to you and say "Would you give me five bucks ?". Just doesn't sound half as cute as "Would you like to buy girl scout cookies". The cookies are more of a prop - they add to the "awww" factor ! :-)   
  Whenever the organization is created, we tends to find the leader, boss, the top-block-of-the-mystery or whatever you call it.  1.Passion  2.Knowledge 
Thank you. It means something!
The linked-to article in the linked-to article (the one twice removed, or `**headline`, if you will) singed the hairs in my armpits, such a flammage it packs; but this one? I don't think it really addresses any of the points raised. You should read both, but be warned: keep a bottle of Mylanta ready if you're weak of stomach.
There aren't all that many choices. LispWorks is the other useful commercial Common Lisp. SBCL is the pretty-good runs-on-Unix free Common Lisp. Neither have a product that competes with Allegro Cache, though the other two bits can be replaced. CLISP is also nice. But you'll have to try them yourself to figure it out.
Mmmm.  I loved the book, but the movie doesn't look like it has the same feeling.  I'll check it out regardless of course, but somehow most movies Gaiman is involved in seem to disappoint.  Something about his vision gets lost in the translation to screen it seems.
Yeah, it's true.  Look how these comments get marked down. Downvoters, it's really not helping your case!
There's a 'slashdottit' box on the articles now. http://slashdot.org/article.pl?sid=07/03/31/2328233&amp;from=rss
Coca-Cola has way too much brand equity to piss it away on guerlla marketing gimmicks.
[Bollards](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bollard) are usually a hollow steel tube driven into the ground and filled with concrete.
A few of the cover letters mention the company's website, and I'd have to agree that it's atrocious: http://killianadvertising.com/ I would never hire an ad firm that thinks that is good taste.
Yeah it is. Keeping in mind that you live in an Orwellian society which defines Freedom as Power. It's why you have Fascist organizations named Freedom House. By the American definition of the term, the Reich was most free. So yeah, I really hate *your* Freedom.
That includes Reddit too. ;-)
Problem is, much like in natural language, where sometimes what you think was a clear, unambiguous utterance gives rise to misinterpretation and second guessing, "meaninful symbol names" are more a matter of subjective judgement and taste than a clear-cut quality. I don't doubt you're a fine coder with both good taste and common sense; but those are not universal qualities by any stretch. Types, on the other hand, are fixed, unambiguous (the compiler must understand them, after all) and most importantly composable, so there's no end to the complexity of the intentions they convey.
Depends. Are you defining a function or a variable whose current value is a closure? I see it as a question of intent, but some find the desugarified version (the latter one) purer.
Ted Kaczynski [wrote extensively](http://www.thecourier.com/manifest.htm) about this.
&gt;Mr. Dowd was impressed by the pledge of Mr. Bush, then governor of Texas, to bring a spirit of cooperation to Washington.  And it took him until now to figure out that he was wrong about that?
Uh-huh. A bunch of the elite priests get together and decide the laws that everyone else should live by. That's awesome. Personally I prefer democracy, but whatever floats your boat. Religion is considered by the masses to be true, the wise as false, and by the leaders as *useful*.
Looks sorta like a sad admission that their days of relevance have ended now that reddit and Digg have taken over.
YO WAT THEY DO EVERYONE
&gt; Currently, 64.5 percent of U.S. adults, age 20 years and older, are overweight and 30.5 percent are obese.  &gt;  &gt; ...  &gt;  &gt; At a minimum, half of all age groups are overweight and at least 20 percent obese. [Source: CDC, National Center for Health Statistics, National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey. Health, United States, 2002.](http://www.obesity.org/subs/fastfacts/obesity_US.shtml)
Funny **and** informative. What more could one want?
"But about a year and a half ago Fedkiw figured out how to run a star algorithm on many processors, resulting in special effects unprecedented in their realism..."
It's what Ballmer feeds his... DEVELOPERS!
I don't agree with the sentiment. You can speak another language and not be in a ghetto.  I have only heard ignorant people talk down to others for speaking in foreign languages.  Newt isn't ignorant, I wonder how he came to such a stupid statement. I agree that it doesn't make sense to print a new ballot for every language that shows up, but printing a ballot in two languages that are common in a precinct cost no more then printing in one language. 
I know that the title comes from the original article, but it ought to be changed. The name of department is "Homeland Security," not "Homeland and Security".
cat food kills family pet, writer goes off on the fda and outsourcing
If you've taken a look around lately, you'd see that the more educated people are, the less children they tend to have. Their percentages will *increase*.
So are you saying donkeys and people should be pulling the plow?
Yeah, I'm curious where it is, too. It isn't LGA, JFK, or SFO. I would've guessed Vegas, but you don't think it's there? EDIT: Looks like it's at the [Marco Polo Airport](http://blog.brainstormbrand.com/design/2007/03/bagaglio-roulette), promoting Casinò di Venezia.
yes they are.
I had used CLisp a few times in the past, I remember giving up after I found that it didn't support threads. Is there anyway around that?
if everyone in the entire world was in deadly peril and i could save them by paying $0.01 ...you're all fcuking dead, cos i'm not paying even one cent to save anyone.   and as far as relatives go... you can kill them all for nothing, and the sooner the better.
[A chart comparing obesity levels in various countries.](http://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/en/a/a3/Bmi30chart.png)
I'm sorry, but Fort Collins &gt; Boulder any day of the week. :P
&gt; They just see themselves (and time-spans) much differently than you see your own life. Which is stupid. Sorry, I just can't think of a better or nicer way to put it. Romanticism has its place in the world, but when romanticism and reality conflict, reality always wins. Always.  &gt; Again, I ask you to put yourself in their position, to have dedicated your life to your farm and your property and your small community for your entire life. Okay, let's say I was a farmer, that I got from my great grandfather, and I see my community dieing around me. I don't want that to happen - I like the little community and my farm and all that. Which is all understandable enough, I certainly sympathize with that aspect. So what would I do? First of all, I wouldn't keep doing "the same thing I'd done all my life, what my grandfather did before me." That's what got me into this position; I sure as hell wouldn't believe that doing the same thing over and over again would eventually produce a different result (Einstein had something to say about that). The first thing I'd do is recognize that I'm now competing in a global economy. If some farmer halfway across the country can produce cheaper crops than I can, then the grocer down the street will stock him, not me. Clearly, I'll never be able to compete with one of those giant corporate farms on price, so instead I'd have to get creative and find another way to compete. One possible way would be to find a niche - go organic, perhaps. Or focus on how I can better serve the local market in spite of price. Try to find a value-added service that a farmer 1,000 miles away can't match. Or anything, really, that would differentiate me from the competition. Technology killed these small towns; innovation in efficiency and changes in the economics of distribution eliminated a lot of the support jobs that kept the population employed. But technology can help here too - low real estate prices, clean air, scenic country, and "small-town charm" can attract from the cities writers, IT folk, and others who can telecommute. I'd ask what my community is doing to market itself as such. I'd examine ways to pull in tourists, retirees, something to make people want to pull off the interstate and spend a couple of bucks. I'd start voting differently. A politician isn't gonna do jack shit for me if he takes my vote for granted - even a small shift in votes in the midwest would be enough to get both parties' attention. Maybe I'd make it work, maybe I wouldn't. It probably wouldn't and I'll be the first to admit I don't know jack shit about these things (Though I'm quite sure that there's *some* model out there that'd work for these towns, waiting to be discovered). But at least I'd be sitting there complaining "I tried everything I could to keep this community alive but nothing worked" instead of "I just kept doing the same thing over and over and over and can't figure out why things didn't get better". It's been at least 30 years since globalization began, and over 10 since Clinton signed NAFTA, when even the densest of people must have realized the path we were on. "I did everything I was *supposed* to do, according to my granddad" isn't an excuse in that light, it's just stupidity. The world changes. Adapt or die. It's a harsh reality, but it is reality. Nostalgia is nice, but it's not a replacement for living in the real world. I can muster sympathy for the people who try to adapt and fail for whatever reason, but I can't muster any sympathy for the people who don't even try.
Unfortunately, Charles Darwin does not go around [baggin' those with an IQ of zero](http://www.queenofwands.net/d/20031208.html).
From the study: &gt;...the experimentor selected two light on dark color combinations (W/BL and Y/BL), two dark on light color combinations (BK/W and GN/Y); the fifth color combination, red on green, is not easily classified as light or dark. Finally, black on gray was chosen because it is commonly used on webpages. So green and yellow is the best combination out of six combinations picked arbitrarily. The only dark on light combinations were black on white or green on yellow. I could assume that the green/yellow combination won out because there was less contrast.  Why didn't they try a dark/light grey combination with similar levels of brightness? They also could have easily tried other colour combinations too with the same level of saturation and brightness too. I would have like to see some testing of the relationship between colours explored: e.g. complimentary, adjacent colours, etc. The Times New Roman suggestion is also not very helpful. They apparently didn't test with different font sizes, with and without font smoothing, etc. They also should have tried a variety of sans serif and serif fonts. Edit: There is also no mention of lighting conditions within the room, monitor type and monitor calibration. All could greatly influence the results.
motherfucking aflac insurance company
I think that the best response would come from the use of bright, huge, centered, red text.
where do you see that? i don't recall that statement in either GGS or 'collapse' ?    --vat
It's already [near by on front page](http://reddit.com/goto?id=1ebed).
did you notice how many borders there were. &gt;ok one more border. there done. no one more border and it will be perfect, no another one. there. 6 borders should do it.
What kind of Adsense CTR are the rest of you getting?
&gt; but the reality is that the original post just asserted that dynamic languages aren't more productive and asserted that nobody could prove the contrary, and then proceeded to give a lot of reasons why. That's not what I got from reading it. First, his thrashing Prechelt's "study" is perfectly valid methodologic critique. Second: &gt; it doesn't follow that reduced code volume leads to increased development speed This is a valid inference, as, say, APL or J are a counterexample *provided* you count analysis (in the broad sense of forethought and planning), debugging and maintenance as comprising "development". If by "development" you mean just "time spent typing", then please say so clearly because it is not normally what's understood by "development". &gt; Dynamic languages are demonstrably more productive in many domains Data, please; otherwise your assertion is vacuous. &gt; Where your intuition and reality differ, it is your intuition that needs tuning. If by "reality" you mean "your intuition", then this is no more than a misunderstanding that could be cleared away by reasoned exchange of data; or at worst trolling on your part. Please try to raise above the level of fanboyism decried in the original article if you want to make a valuable contribution to the discussion.
&gt; how are we going to act in a coordinated manner, Organize for fuck's sake! &gt; It's not like I get up every day and decide not to overthrow the government. You either decide to overthrow the government or you decide to serve it willingly or you're a mindless tool. Which are you? I try to figure out how society works every single day. And I use this knowledge to find its weak points where someone could jam the levers and blow it apart. Why aren't you doing that? Find out what needs to be done, find out how your skills can be put to that use, find out what skills you need to learn to put yourself to good use. Find people with skills &amp; goals compatible to your own and start up an [affinity group](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Affinity_group). Organize, take power and ACT.
Covering international news about women using the highest standards in journalism.
Even if this a Photoshop, it's pretty good.
This blog worst possibly hardest read I have to comprehend in English.
What does this link trick you into doing?
  The Secret Book/DVD is a thought-provoking documentary-style movie about manifesting and how to use The Law of Attraction to create whatever you want in your life —unlimited joy, health, money, relationships, love, youth and dating. The concept says that the energy you put into the world—both good and bad—is exactly what comes back to you. This means you create the circumstances of your life with the choices you make every day. And the choices we make are fuelled by our thoughts—which means our thoughts are the most powerful things we have here on earth. The Secret DVD, along with its teachers- Bob Proctor, Jack Canfield, Reverend Dr Michael Beckwith, Dr John Demartini and James Ray will provide you with astounding philosophy, share amazing real-life stories and testimonials of regular people who have changed their lives in profound ways. Some have overcome great obstacles, and others proving remarkable odds. It doesn't matter who you are, how old you are, what you have gone though in life, where you are right now, or what you want… when you realise The Secret you can have anything !
Sad and bitter.  But Slashdot had a great run; Digg's and Reddit's will be much less long, I feel sure.
&gt; in Haskell you can't have true heterogeneous lists, which are useful in DSLs. The workaround is to wrap the list items: `[H 1, H "a string", H (MyObject "foo")]` What's a "not true" heterogeneous list, a "false" heterogeneous list?. Or rather, whatever is a "true" heterogeneous list? In other words, if by your own admission Haskell can express heterogeneous lists, where's the purported support for your rebuttal?
I actually used this textbook in my first year of college. It was a disaster. I was an honors student so I was allowed to take the brand new Infinitesimal Calculus class, it was the first time this approach was tried at our university, the class was set up just to use this new textbook. There was only one problem: the book wasn't done being typeset. So every monday we received xerox copies of the galley proofs. Unfortunately, they were full of errors, usually we spent wednesday correcting typos and trying to undo all the mental damage we'd done by trying to do the exercises with the errors built in.  But aside from these errors (which I presume have been corrected in this online PDF) the book was a disaster. It was poorly organized, and taught calculus in a very nontraditional manner. Sure it was based on an alternate teaching method, but nobody in our class really got it. This could be the teacher's fault, I don't know. All I know is that my college roommates were running circles around us, everyone who took the regular calculus sections was advancing rapidly but the Infinitesimal sections were stuck. I understand the idea was to give us a better theoretical background by emphasizing deeper understanding of the core concepts, but it didn't seem to help.  I got a D+ in this course, the lowest possible passing grade and the lowest grade I ever got in college. Average grades in this class were the lowest ever given in any calculus course. The course was declared a disaster and abandoned after 2 years. I wish I'd never taken this course. I highly recommend people STAY AWAY from this textbook.
Leave the peanut butter around for 100 million years and see what happens.  I don't think the producers have their mind wrapped around a million years.
Most of what proudly calls itself education is merely a rearranging of ignorance.  Is that accidental? Most education is not truly about eliminating ignorance, per se, but rather about socialization.  Sure, it's great if a few students show an especial aptitude for math or science.  But that small minority of students too often distracts our gaze from the primary purpose of the educational process: to inculcate explicit and implicit social behaviors. Yes, higher education teaches some participants some relatively easily learned technical knowledge; knowledge, it must be noted, that is famous for becoming obsolete within two or so years of graduation.  And yes, a very few post-graduates truly acquire truly advanced technical knowledge. But what a college degree generally denotes is that an individual has paid (mightily) for the privilege of being inculcated with a generally agreed upon set of reflex responses to generally agreed upon workplace stimuli.  Educated workers are workers who know more than anything how to behave... As such, the *last* thing the educational process, *especially* the K-12 educational process, wants to do is "encourage creativity" or produce genuinely creative individuals.  No, indeed -- when a society says it needs more "skilled" workers, it's really articulating its need for workers who will behave properly -- that is to say, behave profitably -- in a corporate setting...
Can we please outsource the servers that hold that key?  Like, now?
This would be a _cruel_ April Fool's joke.
spam
Yah, but they have joint custody and those summers at France's place are great.
Because they are nations.
If you don't live it, you don't believe it.
Ha hah. Wait, let me get that vodka so I can understand.
maybe they dont love jesus enough?
hola  amix  espero q  no esteas  molesto  ps era  una  bromita
so someone who gets off on pictures of animated children is fine but real pictures are verboten?   I understand the "victimless" argument.  There are no people harmed by someone drawing a picture.  The consumers of the media, the market that is created by the art is what is disturbing.  To have comments like that regarding a picture of a corpse, disturbing.  Sexy is not a way to describe a corpse.
JUST TO LET YOU KNOW I AM HERE FOR YOU GOOD LUCK DODACRAZY
i have this vision where i'm the bill o'liarly show and i insult him (still sexually harassing your employees, bill?) and he wigs out, starts calling me names, so i pick up the chair i was sitting in and clobber him over the head and then beat him to death with it. i'd get the death penalty but i'd appeal until we elect a democrat president in 2008, who would pardon me and give me the key to washington DC.
redditalday does, apparently.  Or at least types like that.
I think I liked it better when that connection was implicit.
Guaranteed tail calling. CL's standard doesn't require it. That's the reason idiomatic Scheme tends to be much more recursive than CL.
You can get around it by communicating data in other ways, like through sockets or other IPC mechanisms. Creativity overcomes a lot of limitations.
It already started across the pond...
I've just re-read both of those sections. I found this  &gt; So how can we justify the claim that a particular syntax will necessarily have a particular effect on code volume, or that code volume in turn will have a particular effect on development speed? We can't. Are you saying that's an assertion that dynamic languages aren't more productive and nobody could prove the contrary?   I found this  &gt; If you've never taken measurements, you have approximately no idea what your productivity is like either with or without your favorite dynamic language. Are you saying that's an assertion that dynamic languages aren't more productive and nobody could prove the contrary?  Are you saying that's a claim *that nobody has done measurements*? (Or do you think there's a *nobody has done measurements* claim somewhere else?) 
And it's really difficult to slam your opponent with your inner ear.
Pedagogues often prefer the second for its simpler nature.  The first is syntactical sugar for the second. Dan Friedman in The Essentials of Programming Languages also used the second style.
where's the fcuking link?  i click on page 2 (oout of 3) and it asks for registration info.  down modded
He probably married into that house.
i can't think of anything cute to type here, so i'll just abandon the pretense.
And was even paraphrased in an episode of The West Wing.
I would change the title to "Top ten myths of making money online"
no wonder the UN is so useless. if everyone's invited to the club, is there even a club?
[30 minutes later...](http://www.absolutely-funny-humor.com/funny-photos/slides/Gymn.html)
from a "quality of comments" perspective, slashdot is still light years ahead of reddit and especially digg.  digg is great for kids with 10 second attention spans.
The text of the poll itself, including the questions asked. http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/17875540/site/newsweek/ Scroll down for the god-related questions.
Hmm...  SMS spam is taken seriously by mobile operators.  There are email-&gt;spam gateways.  Email spam is annoying, but not taken seriously by ISPs. Are you pondering what I'm pondering, Pinky? &gt; Uh, I think so, Brain, but burlap chafes me so. &lt;sighs&gt;
"no-future"? I think what you meant is "no-future-with-tons-of-money-which-is-what-I-believe-grants-happiness". Believe it or not some incredibly intelligent people enjoy and even CHOOSE career paths such as a high school teacher for the merit or fun of it rather than being too stupid to get anything but a job suited for a redneck. The pretentiousness of some of the comments on here makes me sick; as if intelligent people cannot exist anywhere amongst you and your peers. I'll chalk this one up to naivety and in 20 years you might just discover that happiness isn't as dependent on circumstance as much as you seem to think it is.
No impeachment, it's over, time to moveon.
If you want to take up smoking, now would be a good time. It's almost a safe bet that, by the time you get sick, there'll be a medical fix. Of course, if you're responsible, you'll also be putting money aside to buy the cloned-lung transplant or whatever - that could make it rather an expensive vice.
Ironically, Moveon.org needs to move on....
In your face, Mexico!
Do you play captain of the high-school debate team in real life too, or only on Reddit? &gt; Go enjoy the rest of your day and let the adults do the talking. I always do enjoy the whole of my days.  There is a problem though... there aren't any adults on reddit, or so it seems on most days. &gt; Since topic under discussion was if making fun of someone's religion was a natural right then obviously race was not germane to the discussion. But you had your agenda to push, so you jumped right in. Oh... so pointing out that what you dress up, like a high-class whore, to be a very eloquent and distinguished argument has in fact its roots in rather primitive racism is a downer.  Is it really? That's a fucking shame...
This weekly column is going to highlight this past week’s fantasy’s highlight and busts.
Whoooaa.....China's starting to look like American cities.....(refer to first hit) Not quite sure yet if this is a good thing.
Was that an attempt at humor? You mean "We Europeans", not "Us Europeans" speak better English.
I've met Ann Wright. It's difficult to describe what she is like, but I'll try: Wright has such a powerful aura of competence, I've **literally** heard hardened, vetran marines swear they would take on the Chinese army, armed only with a spork, if she would lead them. Those kind of people are a rare breed.
mmmbop?
PONIES!!1
we already have a "news" show for women: oprah.  most women are as interested in real news about as much as they're interested in football and hockey.
probably safe, but cruel.
"Smart and Simple Financial Strategies for Busy People" by Jane Bryant Quinn.  This is the first personal finance book I have ever read.  I grabbed it on a whim while browsing the shelves of my local library.  What a wonderful discovery!  I wish I had this book 7 years ago when I was just starting my career.  It is truly a handbook for one's personal finances.  It covers everything from getting rid of debt, to investing, to buy a home.  The author is not only thorough, she is also concise and easy to understand.  I am recommending this book to everyone I know!
You can dance if you want to...
Indeed... why, any time the word "jewish" is heard by an american, they picture a cinnamon skinned middle-easterner.  Right? It is at once sad and amusing to see how much time, energy, and effort is being put into refusing to understand the rather straightforward point I made. I suppose that's the only way to further nourish delusions of superiority on this Reddit of Brilliant Geniuses.
It might have been an attempt at humour.
good for them.
Tsunamix shorts are psycho-surrealist musical movies post-produced to the hilt, les courts métrages psycho-surréalistes Tsunamix sont très post-produits  Tsunamix shorts are psycho-surrealist movies post-produced to the hilt, directed  to short film, video, art, music, Fée Lehouiller,Martin Chartrand, sextantfilms, tsunamix, demo, clip, cinema, independent, production...   
2 months from now you'll be doing articles on lipstick and paris hilton or you'll be out of business
The threads always do stop just when the next post would either have to admit at least partial agreement or veer off into complete delusion... well... that's not true.  That only happens about 50% of the time.  The other 50% of the time, complete delusion is as joyfully embraced as Richard Dawkins' teets by every good little atheist Redditer.
Her ruling will be overturned as so many of hers have been.
is this guy related to maureen dowd? cause i'd like to bang her.
...and now for some [**totally unrelated** news](http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/business/6502725.stm)
Among other possible scenarios, perhaps understood even by those who commute only by automobile, the guy might have had his car in the shop and needed to appear at his workplace, too far away to walk. Incidentally, temperature and precipitation are orthogonal.  I have commuted at -35F, dry as a bone, in the middle of winter in Vermont, to no ill effect.   Of course, I rode in the middle of the street, since there was 6 feet of ice-crusted plowed snow on both sides from previous storms. Personally I don't see the logic in pretending that bicycles are significantly different from other two-wheeled vehicles.  I ride in traffic, have done so for a decade and a half, and continue to do so.  Urban infrastructures are geared towards vehicles and that's it.  Pedestrians go on the sidewalks (when the city can be bothered to keep those passable).  Everyone else goes in the road. It may not be optimal but it seems more workable than any other scenario (particularly the fantasy of bike lanes where bicyclists are in constant danger of getting smacked by a right hand turn or someone parking in the lane). 
That's not fair - that includes yo mama.
the muslims would do exactly what the xtians are doing:  bitching, whining and making threats
aren't they?
The key is that it is not a club, it's an organization whose very existence is based on the idea that all nations participate, similar to how the U.S. Senate has senators representing each state.  The UN has its problems, but the fact that all nations have representation is not its problem, that's one of the things it has done right.   Much of the more recent uselessness of the UN is based on the fact that Bolton did everything in his power to subvert the UN.  Selecting a UN ambassador who is overtly hostile to the very existence of the UN was one of the more crass things Bush has done, especially since he sidestepped the Senate with a recess appointment to appoint the least qualified ambassador the US has ever had.
Obviously you're an imbecile incapable of understanding abstract concepts. It's a wonder you graduated from university when you're incapable of comprehending that using a book full of errors because it's still being typeset might just be the cause of the disaster you described.
Actually, this graph doesn't say it "all"; saying it all would mean including the graph in its original context.
If you're a research biologist then you understand that research involves politics. In other words, academia can not divorce itself from human compromise or back and forth debate. As for your point, you admit it's all a model. Models can be useful. Left at that we would agree without conflict. Likewise we would likely agree that religion is largely corrupt. So since neither of us puts practical science up on a pedestal, nor asserts that it should go without critique -- I'll stand by my original point...  Defining "evolution" is like "nailing jelly to a tree."  (A cliché intentionally chosen for the benefit of biologists that see threats where there are none. Quite understandable of course for research biologists using federal funds. The nice thing about researchers though is that they know just how subjective supposedly objective science can be compared to academics.) So yes, we'd both agree that we are each biased. You clearly have more confidence in evolutionary science than I do. Should everyone? Whenever today's model is typically radically improved over last year's -- as a trend -- that still means that last year's model is no longer worth funding.  "Evolutionary economics" in action.
Then 48% of the people in this country are idiots.
One language English.
Isn't that what he just said?
the complaint is the motivation for the war is american companies would be the ones pulling the oil out.  A lucrative industry.
The poll questions are here:  http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/17875540/site/newsweek/ Me, I think it comes down to what one needs from religion. As a religious person (Catholic) who also believes in evolution, I look to my faith for the "why" but not the "how". That's where science intercedes. Many people, however (evidently 48% of the country), glean the "how" from religion too. I don't subscribe to that because of the sentiment John Paul II expressed best (in his letter endorsing evolution, in fact) when he wrote, "Truth cannot contradict Truth." That is, if we can shed light on some natural phenomenon empirically, then the religious ought to *embrace* it, because it is in a sense a revelation *of* God. One interesting and more optimistic poll result: 68% of Americans think atheists are perfectly capable of being moral. I'm going to go out on a limb and say that's a big improvement from even 10 years ago.
Can these explode if the candy is sealed inside? Example: Someone takes the Coke out and decides they don't want any - puts the bottle back in the fridge sideways.
'Although one in ten (10 percent) of Americans identify themselves as having "no religion," only six percent said they don’t believe in a God at all. Just 3 percent of the public self-identifies as atheist ... Nearly half (47 percent) of the respondents felt the country is more accepting of atheists today that it used to be and slightly more (49 percent) reported personally knowing an atheist.' This could either mean that the term "atheist" is too ambiguous to use in such a survey or that atheists are one of the most connected minorities among Americans. :)
No, actually saying it would mean your computer would speak to you as you clicked on the link. Ever heard of a figure of speech?
Wrong.  Europeans have culture, tradition, wider eduaction...
yeah but the senate is checked by the house, which represents population. if a bunch of african banana republics can gang up to overrule the western world and pass a UN resolution making islam the official religion of planet earth, why not send bolton to F S up? the UN is a sideshow at this point.
Don't let Miniluv hear you talking like that.
Early april fools?
holy shit!  reminds me of the old ladies who have 200 cats and 3 feet of feeces covering the floor
Slashdot's comments are the best IMHO. They've scaled moderation, which is remarkable. Personally I think it's because of meta-moderation.
The important point, though, is that if they'd just reported their methodology honestly and completely, we wouldn't have to make intuitionistic guesses about whether the results are reasonably representative.  As is, this "poll" is worse than useless.  Frankly, I think the substantial majority of Americans do understand and "believe in" evolution (just as most Americans "believe in" gravity).  Just look at the tremendous public preparation for bird flu, a worry that presupposes the validity of evolutionary theory.  I suspect we have a lot more agnostics in the United States than people willing to admit their own open mindedness, particularly when forced into silly choices by headline-making pseudo-polls.
but but but gore buys carbon points!!!
It's all the smiting. Smiting your enemies pumps up your danger ratings. But it's *worth* it! ;)
there's another group that hates women even more than men do: other women.  women are the majority and could own every political office in the country, but they cooperate with each other for more than a minute cos they're too busy fighting with each other over some man
I wonder what percentage of those who reject evolution (whatever the true percentage is) would "stop" evolution if given the option. For example: they're presented with a big red button and told that if there is such a thing as evolution then pushing the button will halt the process. I bet a lot of folks would press the button not because they believe it wouldn't do anything, but just for spite in case they're wrong. The consequence of this is that all organisms become incapable of reproducing, but of course the button pushers don't know this and probably couldn't understand if you explained it.
umm ya that's impossible, we have bulbs made today that burn out after a few months, you telling me something made 100 decades ago can last this long?
You sound defensive.  Since you're in the minority, I understand why.
&gt; There are 17 Muslim countries in the 47-nation human rights council. Their alliance with China, Cuba, Russia and most of the African members means they can almost always achieve a majority. Islamic nations, China, Cuba, Russia, and most African countries (a lot of them Islamic)... beaming bastions of free speech...
The important question isn't "Who has burned more fossil fuels, Al Gore or George Bush?" What's important is "Who is working to reduce global carbon emissions, and who is in the pocket of the oil industry?"   This muddles the debate by making Bush out to be some kind of environmental hero, when his record on the environment is horrendous. Al Gore buys credits to offset his energy use, and that's admirable (of course, he's rich and can afford it). Bush and Cheney had secret meetings with oil execs prior to launching a war that destabilized the Middle East.
that people are interested in impeachment is no reason to have a backlash against it.
Why do you hate America?
One city can skew the state results.  For example, Baltitmore, the crack center of America, probably raises Maryland's criminal status.  I wonder what's so dangerous in Nevada.  Debauchery in Las Vegas?
http://www.gnn.tv/articles/2295/No_Peaking_The_Hubbert_Humbug 'Hubbert’s predictions may have been astonishingly wrong but his little forty-page research report is, nevertheless, astonishingly important in understanding the mindset of Big Oil. Almost everything you need to know about Hubbert and the agenda behind his crucial 1956 study is contained on its cover page. The oil doomsday pronouncement is “Publication No. 95, Shell Development Company, Houston, Texas.” Hubbert was the chief Consultant on general geology for Shell Oil and his “end of oil” paper was presented to the Texas meeting of the American Petroleum Institute. All else flows there from.'
bullshit.  even the people i know who go to church don't believe in god, they just like the tradition and the social interaction.  real belief is for the 2 digit IQ set
Gore doesn't seem to have done enough ahead of time, which would warrant suspicion and criticism. I haven't studied enough facts yet to make a confident judgment.
I got from this article that yes, you do have to feel a little bad for these people, *any* people, that keep doing something honest for a living and it's getting them nowhere.  But I spent a lot of time in Upstate New York visiting cousins like these as a kid. I haven't bothered to phone or write in over a decade. They've kindly returned the courtesy. I live in the blue chewy center(Indianapolis) of a crunchy red state (Indiana), and save for a few college towns, I *refuse* to leave Marion county by anything except commercial jet. I make sure when I'm going to Chicago or Iowa that I am good and fueled up so I don't have to stop at the sticks. One time coming back I had to stop in Pittsboro. A town of I think maybe 400. I have now met 4 people from Pittsboro, and their willful ignorance of anyone "different" (read, black, gay, non-religious, "librul", a non-fan of AM talk radio, etc.) is enough to suck all the oxygen out of the air. I made the mistake of not waiting 'til the next exit to get gas (Brownsburg is much more reasonable). And if you are one of the people happy and proud to live in one of those places, too stupid and proud of your ignorance to make the economy work, I agree with bonkydog. Fuck 'em. Conservative types always are talking to me about social Darwinism and how if you are a black woman who finds yourself too poor to feed your children, you all get what you deserve. Exactly: if you are a moron that doesn't notice that Bush is an idiot and the Repubs don't care about you, that's just too damned bad you're withering out in the sticks. Pobre de tì.
yeah, in your face France! We win yet again
The strongest social, economic, and religious aspects concerning the global community are held within the original influences of the structures of civilizations throughout history. Education concerning these wonderful places on our planet is a must for future generations. We leave many signs of habitation on the ecosphere of earth. Teaching our young men and women about the reasons for those structures are one of the most important aspects of our time spent here. Spending time learning the background reasons behind structures helps us and future generations appreciate the beauty of this world. Many people are turned away by knowledge greater than their own. Some embrace the ideas of others and recognize the hard work for a greater understanding of world history. Just look up at the sky on a clear night and anyone may appreciate the aspects of our vast world.
It's the sheep, bbklyn. Reddit's dead. It's been taken over by brainless sheep of the pseudo-Left, much like our country was taken over by brainless sheep of the Right.  One isn't better than the other, and it's Indymedia all over again: from the promise of democratizing news to gutters of being blocked by Google News for being a hate site. At least Reddit makers managed to find someone stupid enough to buy them before their content got totally fucked.
&gt;if a bunch of african banana republics can gang up to overrule the western world and pass a UN resolution making islam the official religion of planet earth, why not send bolton to F S up? You seem unfamiliar with even the basics of how the UN operates.  They couldn't create, let alone pass, a binding resolution making Islam the planet's official religion.  Seeing as how they did not do anything of the sort, nor can they, you would be sending Bolton in to combat an imaginary and impossible scenario. http://www.un.org/aboutun/ http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/United_Nations 
Next up: How to make a bobby pin using nothing but handcuffs. 
Wow a pro Bush topic on Reddit.  Is this an April fools joke?
Close the sweat shops, let those foreign bastards starve.  Really, they aren't forced to work in these factories.  If there were better jobs to be had in their local area they would work there.  If they didn't need the money they wouldn't work.
I used to think so, too. Until my boss recently ordered 12 GB RAM for the server boxes due to a mistaken diagnosis that memory is being a performance bottleneck. Let that sink in : the typical corporate doesn't have a problem ordering 12 GB of RAM, even if it's *by mistake*. Now we have to figure out what to do with all that RAM. Of course, JVM bloat is still an issue on the desktop (I restart my eclipse every once in a while).
sweet reply, that nailed it
_What's important is "Who is working to reduce global carbon emissions..._ Clearer version: "Who is working to force others to live according to his own hypocritical ideology?".
I don't want to evolve.  I heard it hurts.
BMI is not the same as obesity, though it is an informative chart.
I'll subscribe to your catch phrase the day that Bush fights in Iraq. 
source this b/c it sure sounds like bullshit: http://www.google.com/search?q=%22daily+show%22+al+gore+windmills
sex ?
heh, you had to go off on a tangent because you can't deny gore's hypocrisy
brilliant
Chinese roasted duck &gt; *
Wow. Utterly demolishes the notion that it's got anything to do with wealth.
I'm just pointing out that *hypocritical politician* is redundant.
it's made in Japan.
Reddit's good, but Digg?
The portable allegroserve project appears to work fine, at least in the testing I did about a year ago. http://portableaserve.sourceforge.net/ CL-PCRE gives you full Perl regex. http://www.cliki.net/CL-PPCRE has a link to the ASDF package. You're probably screwed WRT AllegroCache. SBCL seems to be the big winner among free impls, and at least one maintainer is paid by a commercial company at least part-time to help maintain it. clisp is still single-threaded, which is a pain for paserve.
But this seems more illogical: http://reddit.com/info/1edrh/comments/c1ee4f (masterfuol's comment)
&gt; Linguists have a pretty good idea of what PIE was like Err...modern linguistics, even knowing as much about PIE as it does, still can't form a simple PIE sentence AFAIK.
This has been "coming soon" for about 40 years.  If only...
Well, respectfully, I have a feeling we're going in circles;  I'll be brief: speech intended to incite violence != protected speech This is true even in the U.S. (where we like to think of ourselves as the standard-bearers of freedom of speech, in spite of the fact that, for instance, we now commonly hear about "free speech zones" being used to quarantine unwelcome political views...) I would go further and say 'religion != superstition', but I figure maybe everybody on both sides of that one can just go to bed early tonight instead.
http://www.mc.maricopa.edu/dept/d10/asb/anthro2003/lifeways/hg_ag/worst_mistake.html Enjoy.
If someone in my family was in a play or a movie where their character died, it would probably be hard for me to watch, but I'd respect their decision. I don't see how choosing to model is a different case.
Bleh, the U.S. *could* just have a lot of muscular individuals in its populous.  BMI is not indicative of obesity, just your mass:height ratio.  They should make a new graph that is more accurate by using BMI *and* waist circumference. :P
This guy should have pretended to be an illegal.  He would get treated and walk away not owing anything. I would be interested to know of anyone who has tried this.
Does Scheme force you into a functional (recursion and such) style? I know CL doesn't, but does Scheme?
It tricks you into visiting a has-been site that only posts stories that four or five editors deem are suitable for their audience. Then it posts them as duplicates because the editors never actually read the site. 
Nearly all drivers stop at stop signs and lights.  Most signal for turns.  Drivers rarely drive on the wrong side of the road, the wrong way down one-way streets, or on sidewalks.  Few cyclists obey all these traffic laws. If you can't see a difference, you probably can't count.
The press release is dated April 1.
It is nice to learn what our soldiers are really doing over there.  Also nice to learn the definition of "raid"   Raid: looking around, talking to the residents and posing for pictures. Nice headline.
Well, that figure doesn't take into account idiots who believe in evolution. The actual percentage of idiots might be much higher.   
That much I understand, thanks :)
And you apparently cannot engage in any debate without using ad hominems, though I don't understand why you think you need to be on a debate team to realize that ad hominems are a bad debate strategy. How does the argument have any racism in it? I'd be, and have been, equally against laws prohibiting Muslims from wearing burqas or hijabs if they so desire. It is a free speech argument. The racism is a phantasmagoria that you created in your own mind. The fact that SOME other people base their worldview and arguments around their prejudices does not mean that I do so.
a few months back i took a 3 day C++ programming seminar, and the teacher sucked total ass.  on the last day, he handed out evaluation papers for us to fill out and everyone started whining and saying they would write in zero (scale was from 1 to 5) until i convinced them that we should all write glowing reviews and everyone should give him 5's to every question.  i'll bet his boss thought he forged them all.  when he came back into the room we all shook his hand and told him what a great teacher he was.  the look on his face was priceless.   so when it comes to american idol, vote for the biggest fcuking loser they have, that will give the producers exactly what they deserve
I've used GCL the few times that I've had to program in Lisp.
Energy companies give more to Republicans, but they also give substantial amounts to Democrats.  Basically, they want to make sure that whoever is president owes them a favor or two.
this was OFN 20 years ago
Hmm, there may be something to what you say, slashdot seems to be the 'tech site of record' so the luminaries comment there, however, you'll read fewer _junk_ comments on Reddit, since _everyone_'s a merciless moderator here.  And I like it that way, the 'meta-moderate 10 moderations a few times, and we'll surprise you with 5 mod points at some inconvenient time' is BS.
Doesn't Gore also sell carbon credits?
yes, it does more or less demonstrate that it's not "affluenza" but that body size is mostly genetic, right there (though there is plenty of other evidence for this).  Follows more or less Asians are thin, europeans medium sized, and a lot of Africans and Latinos are round (that's a lot of who's in the top countries, United States, UK, Mexico).   Who would ever have thought it, because every time you see a fat person they have a giant tray of ho hos in front of them, right?  Of course you do.  You've seen that, right?  Or was that in a movie, not real life.
[Evolutionism](http://bevets.com/evolution.htm) is the tinfoil hat atheists wear to keep God out of their brainwaves.
Amazing. She's basically spending her whole life as an ideological suicide bomber against feminism.
Uh, how the fuck else do you become more productive? Magic? Help from aliens? Harvesting all the hot air from people like you?
if he had a sense of humor he would have said, "i'm on a mission from god"  and started a blues band
what the hell is vista?
the internet ruined april fool's day
12 hours of downtime, half a dozen calls and emails, and no explanation! A horror story of our recent experience with multiple front-page stories on digg, complete with server death and horrible tech support. Read on for what we've learned from the experience so the same things don't happen to you.
calculus?  hell, i could do it with subtraction and addition
I'm part of a group that mainly works with ACL2, a theorem prover that can run on seven lisps: GCL, Allegro, CMUCL, SBCL, CLISP, OpenMCL, and LispWorks. I mostly use GCL.  It's the fastest Lisp for ACL2.  It's not entirely ANSI compliant, but they have been working towards that for some time.  To my knowledge it doesn't really have any support for multithreading or networking.  It's mainly for Unix and Linux systems, but there is a Windows port which you can get running under Mingw if you're willing to sacrifice three days of your time and your firstborn.  The windows version is significantly slower than the Unix version.  I hear it's really looked down upon by the Lisp community, but it's a fine program most of the time. Allegro is probably the runner up for popularity in our group, and you say you've already had some experience with it.  It's competitive with GCL in terms of speed (maybe 90% as fast for ACL2) and is one of the best documented and best supported Lisps with many libraries, but of course it's not free. I've personally always liked CMUCL.  It's one of the most reliable and stable Lisps I've used.  For ACL2, it's about 30% slower than GCL, which is why I don't use it more often.  But on some of my own applications it's been as much as 50% faster than GCL, so I guess it depends on what you're doing.  Its development list has very little traffic, so I think it may be a dying project. SBCL is a fork of CMUCL that I haven't used very much.  It's apparently somewhat slower but is also more portable.  Perhaps it will be CMUCL's successor.  If it's much like CMUCL, it would be a fine choice. CLISP is dog slow because it's all interpreted.  I've experimented with it a few times but always give up quickly due to how slow it is.  For one of my applications it's about five times slower than GCL.  I have a very low opinion of this Lisp, but perhaps it has qualities I haven't seen.  I did see a screenshot of it running on a cellphone the other day. I haven't personally tried OpenMCL because it only runs on PowerPC (Macs) and 64-bit X86, while my computer is 32-bit.  But it has quickly become very popular in our group and is apparently very good.  It supports native threads and a coworker has been using it in parallel on an 8 processor X86-64 machine.  I think I've heard that it's slightly slower than GCL for ACL2, but I don't know this for a fact. LispWorks is another commercial Lisp.  I've never used it, but I once asked someone else in our group about it, and they had a very low opinion of it, saying it was expensive and unimpressive.  We only have a couple of licenses for it, which is why I've not used it before.
Broke? They won. They could leave tomorrow, and they'll still have won.
&gt;speech intended to incite violence != protected speech  That's my point too! We already have the legal framework to deal with issues of violence. This resolution is mostly about banning "objectionable" or "hostile" comments. Saying "I want Christianity wiped from the face of the earth." doesn't mean that I'm inciting people to kill Christians. But if this resolution served as the basis for further resolutions and actual binding treaties... then free speech would be jeopardized.  As for the US... I'm very sad at the current direction here as well. I hope it changes, but "the crazies" seem to grow stronger with each political defeat they suffer. I take that as a personal challenge to advocate true freedom in better and stronger ways. Hence the commenting here. ;) Our views seems compatible, except for your dislike about the way the title was worded. I'm just trying to show why I liked the title.
Excuse me, sir, I think you dropped your u, g, and h.
lol "carbon credits" you silly liberals are unbelievably stupid when it comes to real solutions
Perhaps a photograph is a better metaphor than sketch, and in that sense this article is like several photographs of some desolate, ruined place. They may be artfully photographed images, but without context to explain what we're seeing we are left with just images -- and no understanding. I wanted to know what was behind the situation, just as I'd want an explanation if I were looking at a series of photographs of dead bodies or blasted landscapes.
Actually, I knew full well that George Bush was bad for the environment; to me it just indicates that Al Gore is *also* bad. After the wonderful science and incredible self aggrandizement that was "An Inconvenient Truth", I'm not the least bit surprised to see this. The movie was very convincing and timely, but I thought Gore shot himself in the foot by so frequently making it about *himself*. My friends and family left the theater saying "Well, I'm convinced this is a powerful threat to mankind, and I'm astounded that Al Gore would make it easier for conservatives to deny it by saying he's just pushing his career, but that's exactly what he's doing." Edit: (Rewrite for clarity)
http://www.mattscutts.com/blog/  http://www.darkseoteam.com/index.php/2005/10/06/23-open-letter-to-matt-cutts  http://www.linux-girl.com/semseo-websites-in-line-to-be-hacked-matt-cutts-beware-screenshot/
haha I'm in advertising. I make money pissing people like you off. Essentially that's not my ethical guidelines or purpose of being in this industry, but it amuses me when people bitch at advertising...   
I do not claim that you do not know how it is to be angry. The statement you wrote communicated your anger quite effectively. The problem is that you mostly relied on exclamation points to communicate that anger, and there was very little in the way of a coherent argument.
Sweet.
This is yet another reason why global top level domains (com, net, org, etc) are a bad idea relative to country code domains (us, uk, jp, etc). Country code domains are directly related to a legal jurisdiction.  Global top level domains have no corresponding legal jurisdiction and so there will always be a legal tug-of-war with respect to those domains. This would not solve all the issues associated with domains but it would at least organize the disputes within some rational legal regime.  Americans could argue about the US government signing the .US domain but Italians wouldn't really care about it.  Japan could create xxx.jp for adult sites and that would be an issue for the Japanese to debate without interference by the US religious right and so on. Global top level domains exist in a legal limbo right now and for the foreseeable future.
Great idea! I can see no downside whatsoever. I love April 1st.
**If** these numbers are true (doubtful), then it doesn't say much for the average level of intelligence of Americans. Going further with that same conclusion, if Americans are **still** persuaded that "God created humans" then it's about time we found a way to kill God for making such a mess of things. Seriously though, these numbers can't be right.  Consider this question, "Do you believe in God?" 91% said "Yes", and 6% said "No".  However, this same 91% when asked, "Do you know any atheists?" said "Yes".  Either they all know the same tiny few athiests, or the respondents are fucking clueless what it means to be either a believer in God, or what an athiest actually is.  I suspect that this latter statement is true (Americans are stupid beyond belief).
That's a gross oversimplification. Diet varies by country, so even if two countries are similarly affluent, they differ not only by genetics, but by culture as well. Different cultures eat different foods and have different stigmas towards obesity, among other things. The fact that the United States is the highest is more indicative that the phenomenon is **not** caused by genetics since it is a nation of immigrants. No other country has a higher rate of obesity, so either every other country's fat people move to the U.S., or there is something about the U.S. that makes people fat. I'm pretty sure it's the latter.
Would **you** trust Homeland *"Security"* with the keys to **anything?**  Not!!
The US is trillions of dollars in debt. They went into debt just for this, and we're hardly having the kind of problems they are. What gives?
Nice find Raldi, good work.
I haven't read your links, but assuming they are accurately titled, **excellent job!!**
Internships, relevant summer jobs, stuff you know...
I'll see your Televised Darts and raise you Snooker.
No. 10 decades, not 100.
Don't be so sure.  I know far *less* then a 9% number of people out of all the people I know that are level-headed and clear thinking.  For the most part (let's see, 100% - 9% = 91%) Americans are **stupid** beyond belief.  Yep, that adds up just right!
All hail the flying spaghetti monster.
Ah. Did not know that. Thanks, and my argument still stands (I think)
"You've seen that, right?" Yo, ding dong, man! Ding dong. Ding dong, yo! http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QG8WUpHdpVA
And with that post Reddit plummets to a sub-Digg and Fark level. Congrats fuckyeah.
I think then you get the Bomb instead of the Eruption.
Gary is an online maniac that spend most of his time browsing and surfing the internet. He knows something of almost any online activity. Here's his recommendation on How to safely uninstall starware from your computer.
While we're picking these delicious cherries, when's the last time you saw someone make a trip in a car without exceeding the speed limit? BTW: I ride every day, and I obey them.  Also I know how to count.  It's based on peano arithmetic.
She always amuses and educates me.
"not caused by genetics" We do have more Africans than all of the other countries listed and more hispanics than most of them, so the theory is consistent. I've also suspected that, whatever the country, the modern penchant for skinnyness will tend to make thin women avoid children in order to preserve their figures. This will have obvious evolutionary effects.
Wow.  I believe it.  There are many people in this town where I live that are grotesquely fat.  Downright obscenely fat. It's rather embarrassing, really.  I don't even want to walk down the same supermarket aisle, I'm afraid they're throw me in their basket along with their twinkies and chocolate pies.
I don't think I stand alone when I point out that its not exactly burning "bright" to this day.
of course they reject it, they're inbred
JEFF SPICOLI'S RESPONSE:   Dude, fat chicks like to put things in their mouths. This graph is a GOOD thing.
YUCK
How about a glass for my scotch shaped like a liver?
Why is everyone just commenting about the mother aging? It's not like the dad didn't get older either. What, you think you're supposed to look like you're 20 when you're 50?
I am American, and I fail to see how watching cars go round in circles for 200 or so laps is entertaining in the slightest.
So what?
Yeah, what they said.  You're quite wrong about this.  Most Americans **are** fat.  It's disgusting.
I doubt that a class full of Honors Students were all universally incapable of understanding abstract concepts, and we all got bad grades. Yes, the typos sucked, but the book sucked even after corrections. My university's math department abandoned this textbook after declaring it a failure.
Just stating that in the discussion of 'red states' we typically hear about Kansas, Texas, Alabama, etc.  Indiana doesn't typically come up in conversation.
Why change if you're already perfect?
"Kerry was right"... ya think?
&gt; "no-future"? I think what you meant is "no-future-with-tons-of-money-which-is-what-I-believe-grants-happiness". I mean "no future" as in "no future in which the community is not perpetually dying". Almost all of the younger people are leaving, the farming economy which supports small towns is going downhill, and in large parts of farming country there will be a huge crisis in a few years when the wells run dry. We're not talking about lack of opportunity to get rich; we're talking about economic collapse. And I'll thank you not to put words in my mouth.
where's china? even less than the lowest or no data available? when i was there, it was remarkably fit all around.
"fck u pig" will get even more tickets, and not just parking ones
Here's the story behind it: http://www.snopes.com/photos/advertisements/duckthief.asp
Why must Bush "believe" it?  If he doesn't, how is that relevant?
who isn't?
i.e. IT NEVER HAPPENED gtfo liar because we all know the internet doesn't get updated that quickly
&gt;advocate true freedom in better and stronger ways. I'm for that. I'll add that I think we should do this the way they did in the Sixties: by having a lot of open-air rock concerts where people dance naked.   
Yo, that's one sick ride!
It what possible way could it be good?
An epilogue on the defacement of Maddox's fan site.
Yeah it would be impossible if it wasn't.
Mans pipe gets cut off and thrown to dog. Why? Well he was suspected by his wife for cheating on her.
I have been known to bike down to -15F without being uncomfortable.  The only reason I haven't gone colder is that I haven't had the opportunity.  There's no sliding if roads are clean.  And believe me, nothing's wet at that temperature.
If you haven't seen the rest of the show, go watch it! These guys are nuts.
Now in Gmail, you can request a physical copy of any message with the click of a button, and we'll send it to you in the mail.
I'm not. I hate this whole country, you and them. You're both sucking everything into a downward spiral from which we will never, ever recover. I'm emigrating before I have children so my descendents will be natural born of another country.
this piece of news is unhelpful. Evidently, [Al Gore is honestly enthusiastic about the climate crisis](http://ted.com/tedtalks/tedtalksplayer.cfm?key=al_gore).
Have you seen most of America? My gym is two miles from my house, but I couldn't jog or bike there if I wanted to. Bike lanes? Ha! Sidewalks? Who needs 'em. Welcome to suburbia. We've made the mistake over the last century of building our cities around cars, and now that more and more people are starting to realize that more and more freeways aren't going to cut it, it's too late to rebuild our cities around pedestrians and efficient transit.
Yup, he did.
I heard from someone who worked for GE that they basically decide how long they want incandescent bulbs to last now, and could make one that lasted a very long time for similar cost, if they wanted to.
or... leave it blank maybe?  I seriously doubt they'll let you get a blank personalized plate, though that would be cool.
hey look here: http://www.imdb.com/name/nm0330722/filmogenre#talkX2Dshow the last time al gore was on the daily show was in june 2006
I'm sure that some is genetic, but I'd wager that for the majority of people it isn't. Remember that a BMI above 30 is considered obese. Look at the kind of food Japanese people eat. If you want a snack then most of the time you will be out of luck. There is very little "fast food" around. You'd be much more likely end up getting a bowl of Ramen Soup rather than a Big Mac. Go to somewhere like the Philippines, and you'll find KFC or MacDonald's on almost every corner. As a result "27 percent of women are overweight or obese." - http://www.fao.org/ag/magazine/0602sp1.htm
&gt; I've also suspected that, whatever the country, the modern penchant for skinnyness will tend to make thin women avoid children in order to preserve their figures. Whuh? What make you think that thin women remain fat after pregnancy ends?
I'm also American, and have never watched it, but imagine that the interest is based on subtle strategy.
Didn't you know that 35% of American's are professional body-builders? AFAIK the BMI is good enough as a rough guide, and is probably well suited to a comparison like this.
i read this to on the LA med officer site
I find the huge difference between the U.S. and Canada interesting since they have similar cultures &amp; economies. Why the big difference?
great
somehow I think someone is going to buy that
Gao going to the US to get the award was stopped by the Government of Henan province, where she lives. Gao was finally be able to make it because Hilary Clinton intervened, pleading to China’s President and Premier.
A bright, creative, free-thinkin', gay atheist actually *could* be welcome in one of those small towns. By being in the closet. When I lived in a small, rural town I didn't know of anybody there who was gay or an atheist -- publicly. Privately, it was a different story. It sucks, a lot.
His hair's white, not black.
Dude, the fact that that question can even be asked seriously is an indication that the debate in that country has been framed somewhere right of ludicrous.
PedelPub
&gt; 00 No 00.  They're advertising [European](http://reddit.com/info/1e9mx/comments/c1edzs) roulette.  (No 00 means  only 2.7% house advantage.  American Roulette is nearly twice that. :-) Roulette is a great European game completely ruined by us (America).  Another one is Baccarat. :P
I'm still waiting for "The asshole delusion" (works both ways, btw)
As an Israeli I have a certain perspective and yes, I don´t think Israel is evil. What´s your excuse?
&gt;Indeed... why, any time the word "jewish" is heard by an american, they picture a cinnamon skinned middle-easterner. Right? No, they picture a hook-nosed white man, probably highly educated and financially well-off thanks to his successful career in medicine or law.  And they picture him eating a pastrami sandwich at his granddaughter's Bat Mitzvah while trying to make an imporant point about life to her in Yiddish. My point is that, very recently, this stereotype has become wildly inaccurate.  It was reasonably accurate for a long time, but the majority of world Jewry now lives in the State of Israel, and that majority shows no sign of shrinking. Actually, the originally "brown" Ashkenazi Jews who, by rape, became "white" over time serve as a perfect example of just how stupid it is to divide the world based on skin color, especially because there are gradations between the European and Semitic phenotypes in Ashkenazi Jews.  My blonde brother's skin burns in summertime (European) while I tan deeply and get highlights in my normally dark-brown hair (Semitic).  You would lump both of us in as "white", because you lack experience in spotting Semitic features.
&gt; I have now met 4 people from Pittsboro, and their willful ignorance of anyone "different" (read, black, gay, non-religious, "librul", a non-fan of AM talk radio, etc.) is enough to suck all the oxygen out of the air. That's why you make sure to speak about boring neutral topics like the weather and the local geography. For example, if you notice that there is unexpected cactus in the area you could mention that. You could have a quite pleasant conversation with them. And the younger people -- the ones who haven't graduated high school and left -- are fairly likely to be a lot more liberal than their elders. That's encouraging.
Aha! Story downmodded for linking to the punchline of what would have otherwise been a good joke.
Can anyone explain why it's only 28 bits long?  Why not use a full integer as a hash value?
oh look, another link showing that al gore hasn't been on the daily show in 2007: http://www.tv.com/the-daily-show/show/1293/episode_listings.html?season=12&amp;tag=nav_bar;12
Good point. In my suburban neighborhood, I could in theory walk to the grocery store since it's about 2 miles from my house. However, once I start walking down the sidewalk from my house, the sidewalk literally ends after a half-mile and I have to risk life &amp; limb running across 4 lanes of traffic to get to the other sidewalk. From there, I'd risk trying to cross multi-lane intersections. On the way home, would have to run across the 4 lanes of traffic again (groceries in hands) to get to the sidewalk that goes home.
I thought you were simply malcontent?
Wooa, that was cool.
Actually, IQ has a gaussian distribution in every population ever studied, therefore roughly 50% of the population falls below the 100 point mark. The area under the curve is the same under both sides of the peak.
This will open the door to a new kind of internet porn.   
There's a much better way—maybe several—to make an actual floating boat out of origami, but the one I'm thinking of requires doing an inversion that might be very difficult at that scale.
only an idiot would say what you just wrote
Just give me my t-shirt-wearing dancing monkey.
Clean power is already here.  Fission works quite well, and the small amount of radioactive waste is easy to contain.
the second one is more refined, better effects, etc. but i prefer the original. :)
"imagine" that.
Yes. He buys them from himself. http://www.news.com.au/sundayheraldsun/story/0,,21309812-5006029,00.html Quoting from the article: &gt;But there are at least four problems with such offsets, the first of which is very particular to Gore. And that is Gore buys his offsets through Generation Investment Management, whose chairman is . . . Al Gore. &gt;What's more, GIM's business is not to itself remove carbon from the air, but, it says, to "buy high quality companies at attractive prices that will deliver superior long-term investment returns". &gt;Oh, and by the way, those companies have to be green. Some are even wind farms, although even they -- don't kid yourself -- produce some greenhouse gasses. &gt;So Gore isn't so much buying offsets as investing in fashionable companies for profit. Lucky him. Rich him.   
Yeah! I hate those goddamned retarded stereotypes. Always coming in and taking our jobs and corrupting our values. They should all be shipped back to Stereotopia!
It gets less creepy after a while. Honestly, you get used to little stuff like that. You get used to having random strangers come up to you and somehow know who you are and what you've been doing recently. God, that sounded really creepy when I wrote it down! But you really do learn to take it in stride. What's harder to deal with is the consequences of that phenomenon. Your reputation becomes inescapable, and you end up monitoring your public conduct a lot more carefully than you ought to. If you do or say something that the community doesn't like, then the only people who will ever forget it are the ones with Alzheimer's disease. (Perhaps I exaggerate a bit. But *only* a bit.)
I watched cricket while in the UK, and looked to be a form of "Calvin Ball". Guy hits the ball, and then runs back and forth between the wickets until the ball is retrieved. So you get crazy scores like 300 to 250. It's a weird lil game. That said, it's still more interesting than Nascar which involves cars going in loops for hours on end. Nascar is only good when crashes occur. They need like RC fullsize cars with weaponry, then I would watch it! :D
lol "market capitalism" stupid liberals.
Which isn't too far from reality, given most of their protests seem to involve burning US, Israeli, and recently dutch flags while chanting "Death to X". Even protests not directly involving the US or Israel seem to contain some faction burning a flag for hoots. 
The design shown in the picture is the worst possible design for a bike lane.  Between the curb and the parking lane?  Lots of taxicab and bus passengers to smash into, and no visibility to, or of, turning cars at intersections.
Maybe I've never experienced quite the right brand of suburbia, but usually there's *some* kind of gravel shoulder or something that can be walked on. That's definitely depressing to have to jump in your car and drive for 2 miles. I dunno... lobby the local authorities for a pedestrian bridge over the highway? (edit: clarification.)
you realize its satire, right?
Your link doesn't work geekygirl  \t  404 Error  The page you requested cannot be found. The page you are looking for might have been removed, had its name changed, or is temporarily unavailable.
Because they no longer look like shanty towns? The architecture you see is found everywhere internationally because it's efficient, safer, healthier, and a bit sightlier than almost every prior kind of city construction. (assuming it's built to modern standards :-| ) Then again, some people think Chinese people are supposed to live in pagodas simply because they're Chinese. Screw authenticity.
Gaydarski?? This has to be a joke.
It's not that bad. I quite like this part, from their page of information for people wanting to apply for jobs there: &gt; **What's your dress code?**  &gt;  &gt; Since naked employees tend to be distracting, our dress code asks employees, politely but firmly, to dress. Those who remain persistently, defiantly nude are subject to a reprimand. (We haven't had to resort to that yet, but we are ever vigilant.) There's work to do, people, even if "dressed up" around here means wearing socks.
I don't think they're going to "go to war" explicitly. I think they will claim to be doing a surgical strike to disable the nuclear facilities, much like Clinton's attacks after the Embassy bombings. Any escalation after that will be blamed on the Iranians. That's my guess, anyway...
"I'll subscribe to your catch phrase the day that" So you *do* subscribe to his catch phrase.  Silly goose.
$1,000,001.00 - just out of my reach...
They've passed binding treaties making the International Criminal Court the court of the planet, with "international" jurisdiction in non-signing nations. Most of the time they're just blowhards, but when the U.N. really tries, it tries to make itself a world government.  Yes, that sounds like a conspiracy troll, but what else do you call a court with jurisdiction all over the world if not an embryo of a world government?
OK, now why are they (and most of the Muslim countries) on the U.N. Human Rights Council?  Shouldn't seats on the HR Council be reserved for only those member nations with clean-as-a-whistle human-rights records (ie: just about only Canada)?
-1 for use of Comic Sans. Sorry; it had to be said.
Quick hack (based on ext) if you have greasemonkey instaled - http://userscripts.org/scripts/show/8251
Is that the real Bevets?
So we've got an abundance of food and we like to eat. Is that such a crime?
Then again, the average American isn't an emaciated skeleton like in Zimbabwe :\
Actually, it's underwear.  If you look closely at the comment thread, someone posted a link to the (funny) picture on flickr that the underwear was copied from -- a self-portrait of a woman wearing the underwear on her head. It's possible the creator of the composite image intended to imply stupidity, rather than violence, but the result has a kind of Giger-like horror factor going on there, regardless.  I couldn't tell it was underwear, even though it's obvious in the source photo.
Americans' anal obsession with free speech, because their nation recognizes no other human rights whatsoever, makes a mockery of all human rights *including* free speech. The ideological and worshipful tone Americans assume when talking about Free Speech, the *least* important of all human rights, is very much reminiscent of the Islamic fundamentalists when they portentously pronounce You Shall Not Mock My Idol!
Far from directly a book about the UN, it's informative as to why the organization functions more as a scape goat (Shake hands with the devil):http://www.amazon.com/Shake-Hands-Devil-Romeo-Dallaire/dp/0099478935/ref=pd_bbs_sr_1/102-6109037-3616933?ie=UTF8&amp;s=books&amp;qid=1175404755&amp;sr=8-1 hands with the devil
You give an american a big block of ice and they invent the vodka luge . . . give a canadian a big block of ice and they invent hockey and curling.
Or, perhaps, Americans feel embaressed about admitting to *being* an atheist, but will gladly talk about their atheist friends. A lot of atheists I know make up a sort of warm, fuzzy, vague sense of spirituality just so they can tell believers they believe in *something*.
I was just visiting Silicon Valley for the first time last week, and the driving aspect was definitely my least favourite part—seems like it's pretty much impossible to live in Mountain View or Sunnyvale and *not* own a vehicle. It must be okay in Palo Alto, since surely the students wouldn't all have cars, but still... compared to NY where *no one* has one, it's kind of a shock. (I don't mind walking; I walked [almost 10 miles](http://maps.google.com/maps?saddr=298+Market+Street,+San+Francisco,+CA+94105+%4037.792623,-122.397159&amp;daddr=sausalito,+ca&amp;cid=37792623,-122397159,1807673887435256859) on Thursday afternoon, but walking is not a permanent solution for getting to work and so-on. If the transit sucks, and it's too spread out for anything else, there's a problem.)
And not a bit of common sense. At least, that's what my dad says, and he mostly worked in Germany. They put a lot more reliance on paper education than experience. And it's rarer to get a manager who started on the shop floor with a lot of pratical experience in upper management. "Hey, X worked really well at factory 1, we should apply those techniques to the others."  "Really? We never considered that..." He said they'll have all sorts of degrees, but sometimes lack practical skills or insights (kinda like some college professors). So you get a blend of yankee ingenuity and their skillsets if you do things right.  He respected their technical acumen, and they respected his 'in the trenches' experience with a variety of production problems.  In mexico, the biggest cultural problem was initiative. Workers very rarely responded to problems proactively unless  given direct orders by the boss. So unless you were walking the shop floor 24x7, it was hard to tell if they were having problems. It's a cultural thing. They were very hard workers though, and once you got them to understand it was good for everyone to tackle problems when they occured, things went much smoother.
All right, but they could really learn from the master: http://www.dba-oracle.com/dress_code.htm
But for real, doesn't this seem like it's a viable idea that some people would find useful?  It says in the sidebar that the cost would be covered by printing unobtrusive ads on the back of the print outs, and I could see some business users wanting hardcopies of all emails for billing or tracking purposes or whatever.  Yes, people could print out their own emails, but above a handful, that get really hard to do for a large number of gmail emails. I'm not saying this service is a great idea, but it also isn't all that crazy.
Oh, Google.  You always make me laugh come April 1st.
uh - wat satire?
it made me want to *eat* some mentos, anyway... *(...heads off to the corner store...)*
There is zip content to any of your comments.  You need to note by the way that being born in a foreign country doesn't ensure citizenship.   US is an anomaly.   
Time to move Al. Of course, what the letter fails to mention is that each of them probably has multiple residences.  What about Bush's other residences?  What about the big compound being prepared in So. America for Bush when he retires?  How much native habitat is being destroyed for that? but, yeah, when Bush has a more ecologically friendly and energy efficient abode than Gore, well, it's time for Gore to put some of that money from "An Inconvenient Truth" to work to make his own place efficient or buy a new place that's all solar powered or something. [Just curious: are the downmods for suggesting that Gore should practice what he preaches or for mentioning the So. America Bush compound or for suggesting that both of them have multiple residences?]
Please, these neocons aren't even right-wingers.  They aren't fiscally conservative, they are only all talk about the social issues that real right-wingers care about (otherwise why are they always surrounded by gays and pedophiles).  They aren't moral people.  They didn't protect gun rights in New Orleans even...  It's time to seperate these people out from the old school republicans.   Neocon Bushlims, that's what they are...
Prices here:  http://www.plasmadesign.co.uk/pricelistuk.htm
Yeah--why solve the problem, it's so much easier to deny it exists!
I would love to see a table correlating this with consumption of refined carbohydrates
&gt; The move to the right here in Japan is palpable and is of serious concern to anybody who would like to see democracy take root here. "Take root"? Surely you aren't implying that Japan is not a democracy?
In America you will find the poor people are fatter then the middle and upper class.  Edit More Information:  Poverty Levels state by state:  http://factfinder.census.gov/servlet/GRTTable?_bm=y&amp;-geo_id=01000US&amp;-_box_head_nbr=R1701&amp;-ds_name=ACS_2005_EST_G00_&amp;-format=US-30  Obesity Levels state by state: http://www.thedenverchannel.com/health/2269064/detail.html
"mistake"?! Is that like a woman who goes out with abusive men again and again and again and again? Always a "mistake"? Bullshit! You WANTED a fucked up, alienating,  psychopathological, hugely expensive suburban environment. You wanted a built environment that reflected the values of the rat race and conspicuous consumption. The values of pig-headed Individualism and fuck the community and fuck the world and fuck common sense. YOU BEGGED FOR IT! So don't come over at this late date talking about what a fucking "mistake" it's supposed to have been. Take some goddamned responsibility for your actions!
depression?
Aprils 1st...
Completely aside from fat issues, was that safe for the dog? But yeah, read the bits about suburbia below.  Around here we get around on bicycle until we get our drivers' licenses, at which point the car finally gives us the freedom to travel outside our stupid little town.
Thanks for clearing that up for me.
Only an idiot would think serious problems in our nation can be solved by owning guns.   This is coming from someone who owns several.  
It's a considerably better gag than 2005's [Google Gulp](http://www.google.com/googlegulp/) (google.com) or last year's [Google Romance](http://www.google.com/romance/) (google.com).
rubbish. this is an urban legend. no place on the planet hasn't experienced at least a temporary power outage since 1901.
What still remains to be said (and probably never solved) is what sparked the ancient geniuses to start naming things complex sounds anyway. I mean, It's unlikely Jethro Etruscan looked into the field, saw the horse-like beast and blurted  'ASS' right out. What about that sound describes the animal? Why does any word have it's original meaning?
I prefered the pink ponies thing.  In fact, they should've kept that.
It's like my best friend's favorite saying:  "Advocacy of Intelligent Design is indistinguishable from parody of ID."  Brilliant!
How right you are.  Suburban America was built to my personal specifications.  I remember the day when the Urban Planning Authorities of our great nation, in conjunction with some of America's largest and most powerful corporations, rang my doorbell and asked me, "Would you like an environment that reflects the values of the rat race and conspicuous consumption?"  "Why, yes, that would be lovely," I replied.  And so it was done.
what's "grestest" ?
Thanks For The Support
Hehe, I'm guessing you dont know a whole lot about having kids.  While some women do work incredibly hard to regain their figures after pregnancy, there are often some fairly irreversible changes.  Plus a fairly dramatic lifestyle change that can make it pretty hard to be down the gym every other day.   Fact is that most women, quite reasonably, will either be unable or unwilling to completely regain their original figure.
And after the constitution is amended during their first term... the Governator may well yet be Vice President, and then President! http://www.google.com/search?q=arnold+schwarzenegger+for+president
But a long way from [PigeonRank](http://www.google.com/technology/pigeonrank.html).
yokiro taco bell lol
A lady in Grant,Iowa, is collecting blue jeans to make quilts for wounded soldiers returning from Iraq. She needs donations of blue jeans.
Braindrane got wind confused with solar, and the Daily Show confused with Fox News.  An honest mistake. [Here's](http://www.foxnews.com/story/0,2933,259938,00.html) a link from a source I'm sure you'll trust.
There's nothing in there about eating the sculpture -- seems like a case of stretching the story for a snappier headline.
Parks make money. When the agricultural products from a chunk of land is less than the recreational (or spiritual or whatever) value, then it becomes parkified.
They should print on toilet papaer as well, that way besides being environmemtally friendly, you could make a statement about all the spam mail you receive...
Yikes!  I believe the most deadly sports disasters of all time have been all been either tramplings or collapsing stands.
Who gives a shit about the duck, that chick is smoking hot.
For the RECORD.  The abuses that were shown on television, were CENSORED.  Things that you didn't see, but did occur, included the following: - Sodomization of detainees with batons  - Anal rape &amp; sexual abuse of minors (both boys and girls)  - Pouring Phosphoric Acid on detainees  - Homicide http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Abu_Ghraib_prisoner_abuse I'm sorry if you're not grown up enough to realize that television isn't reality...
I think there is [a text-only version of the novel](http://www.amazon.com/Stardust-Neil-Gaiman/dp/0060934719/) (amazon.com) but for some reason I thought they'd based the movie, or at least the storyboarding, on [the illustrated version](http://www.amazon.com/Neil-Gaiman-Charles-Vess-Stardust/dp/156389470X) (amazon.com). You're right though, I guess it isn't a graphic novel per se.  More like a novel with illustrations.
Of course, the 1200 baud link into North Korea will only be slightly effected.
...and a strange thing happened to science professor, Dr. Jack Wilson, who went home to his trailer and felt a funny sensation like the most severe headache he had ever had. He got up to get a drink of water and asprin, took it, and then suddenly found he was hyper-intelligent, could walk through walls, fly, and move objects with his mind. So, naturally, he sat down and sewed himself a spandex super suit and a cape.
United States number 7? 0_o ???
Or, well...not.
I doubt that a class full of honors students all laid the blame on the subject matter. First of all, understanding isn't synonymous with knowledge. Knowledge and expertise can be acquired with rote memorization. Understanding and mastery cannot. In [Bloom's taxonomy of knowledge](http://www.coun.uvic.ca/learn/program/hndouts/bloom.html), understanding requires synthesis, expertise does not. Second of all, your arguments sucked. Your rant was incoherent, self-contradictory and at times (eg, "non-traditional") stupid. It's blatantly obvious that you lack critical thinking skills and especially the synthetic ability which underlies understanding. That's because deductive reasoning can be turned off but synthesis cannot. It doesn't matter how out of your field rhetoric and philosophy are. If you had any great talent at synthesis, you would have assimilated them by osmosis. You wouldn't be making stupid incoherent arguments. Finally, if the whole goal of the class was to promote understanding of concepts and you don't have the talent for it, then it's obvious why you failed. Mathematics classes simply aren't structured to promote understanding and it's clear that's not a quality common among mathematicians. So maybe this textbook wasn't appropriate to make your pea-brain go vroom vroom. I like to think this says more about you than it says about the book. Go ahead and keep warning your fellow lemmings about it, but I reserve the right to mock you.
I realize that they are only a subset, but they are very activist (like the people who influence the FCC on TV issues) and the problem is that they are equating the sight of a bottle as evidence of a person's failure as a mother - for instance, check out one of their top "activism" items. An artist who does kind of 50's style, cartoonish illustrations (like esurance ads style) has a picture of a "supermom" with a baby and a bottle and they are demanding that the e-card site take it down. Wait, why wouldn't a supermom be pumping? How is a bottle evidence of lack of breastfeeding? How weird and petty is it to attack artwork? I wonder what the artist would think if she knew (the site appears to use art from a wide variety of artists). Maybe the artist herself beastfeeds? The irony of course, is that the site they are attacking allows you to use your own photos to make cards with, so they could actually be using the site to promote breast feeding by creating their own pro-breastfeeding cards with their own 'Look at me, I am a great mom because I am breastfeeding' photos. It all just comes out as very classist when I read it. What educated, upper-middle to upper class woman nowadays doesn't know about the vast benefits of breastfeeding vs corp-o-baby juice? Hell, I'm a dude and I could rattle off a laundry list of stuff.  One of my favorites - a study was done where women were interviewed with their toddlers present and they found that the mothers who breastfed were attentive to and responsive to very small stimuli from their toddlers during the interview and held, touched, talked to them more where they found that bottle feeders tended to ignore the toddlers more. So on a practical level anyone who wants sanity and quiet where mothers and small children are around should be a breastfeeding fan.
Never let someone else define who you are... Dictionary writers included...
Well, there's only one difference. Speed. Unfortunately, drivers tend to get very, very unhappy (read: abusive, dangerous, and violent) when they are stuck behind a slow moving vehicle. If you have a way of solving road rage, I'm sure there are lots of people who would love to hear from you. Until then, physically separating the slow moving vehicles from the fast ones seems prudent. I'm not blowing the problem out of proportion. People really get unbelievably angry. More than I would've believed possible if I hadn't been subjected to it myself.
But aren't ethics something that you should be schooled in if you're in advertising?
He's asking people to be carbon neutral, not to live in a mud hut and ride a bicycle everywhere they go.  You can live the lifestyle of your choosing as long as you're willing to pay to offset it through the use of alternative sources of energy and/or carbon credits. Please pull your head out of your ass and stop coming up with your own lame excuses not to lift a finger to do the right thing.   If you don't care about the environment or global warming, just say so.  Don't invent some lame pretext to justify your ignorance and/or apathy.
Maintaining a reasonable weight has practically nothing to do with going to gym and everything to do with not stuffing your face with crap.
Hinduism is nothing but a covert mask of casteism.
Hinduism is nothing but a covert mask of casteism.
Hinduism is nothing but a covert mask of casteism.
Hinduism is nothing but a covert mask of casteism.
Simply bad.   Crowded, sections misaligned, no sense of structure or flow. &gt; [blah blah blah] ... means nothing if you do not have the best marketing Oh!  It's *spam*. Down-modded.
Samoa is noticeably absent from the graph.
Stuck in a funk?  America isn't evil... Only Neocons and their unthinking Religious Bushlim followers are evil... Unfortunately for us they hijacked a political party and stole 2 elections... Aren't you tired of staring at that wool yet?
I hadn't seen that one!  Looks suspiciously like [Mechanical Turk](http://www.mturk.com/mturk/welcome) (mturk.com) :)  Do you think Amazon paid Google for their idea?
Totally and completely incorrect, NASCAR sucks so hard I can’t express it in English words.
OMG that's funny, Van. And Doctor Jack saves the planet from a 100ft bald Britney Spears robot just in the nick of time.
Hinduism is nothing but a covert mask of casteism.
Microsoft has a long history of pandering to mediocre developers, giving them just enough rope.  Look at MSDN magazine.  Every issue gives you 20 new complicated APIs that supercede the ones people are already using.  The message is "look at what we're doing for you."  But the reality is, it is a development treadmill.  MS developers are locked into "cool features" and constant stream of dazzling technology that always makes last week's code legacy.   In my opinion, C# was designed directly from Java's bug list.  Sun said "well, we see that you want unsigned ints but we're leaving them out for this reason."  MS said, "Hey, you want'em, you've got'em, consequences be damned." 
Just remember today's date.  Enjoy.
Hinduism is nothing but a covert mask of casteism.
Yeah, I don't see the point in getting angry about this type of thing. Sure, the US has a weight problem, but only those that are completely ignorant would assume the entire country was a population of lazy NASCAR loving slobs. I take it as a joke, laugh, and then read some other reddit posts. Yes, it was hilarious.
Western drum rhythms are so boring compared to Indian, African, hell, anywhere else in the world.
Yes, and it's not just that.  Properties and events are completely superfluous features.  They aren't an improvement on Java in my opinion.  They are training wheels for people who don't know how to use classes effectively.
Then why did you use "we" asswipe? I quote: &gt; **We**'ve made the mistake over the last century of building **our** cities around cars If you want to disclaim all responsibility for the atrocities and obscenities produced by your nation *go right ahead*. No seriously, be my guest and *renounce being an American*. Mwaha MWAHHAHAHAHA!
A similar nonexisting Google product I'd be happy to pay for: Gmail DVD archive - a DVD with all of your e-mail w/attachments.  I'd be fine with paying $10 to get something like this in the mail once a year as my 2+ gigs get used up pretty quickly and I have to clean the inbox out every few months.
This is why European cities have lasted thousands of years, and American ones may die after 500 years and be replaced by others.  Also why Americans are practically giving up on New Orleans--it's not practical to try to save  it.
Yes, that's generally true. But the point is that internationally there is no such correlation at all. I find that interesting.
OWNED...that's all I have to say after reading that!
Al Gore is through in the Democratic party. If he is going to be president he has to find another route. What to do, what to do? I know! Run to the front of that ready made pack of earnest enviros in their earth tone shirts and lead them to take over the Green party and then run as their candidate. Sound like a plan?
um, yeah.
I'd like to see some more facts about this bulb like the ratio of light output in lumens to its power consumption in watts. I found one page that says it is approximately a 4 watt bulb, but no mention of its light output.
I'd say the middle panel is how Americans see those that don't buy into the first panel.
You say that because you're used to using political words according to their nonsensical Orwellian definitions assigned to them by the American propaganda system. The term "right-wing" has a clearly defined meaning that makes it useful as a vehicle for communicating ideas. Right-wing INCLUDES fascists, Nazis, *liberals*, neo-liberals, neo-conservatives, paleo-conservatives, and right-libertarians. The term right-wing MEANS adherence to propertarianism over and above any consideration for social justice based on human rights. This is what the term means everywhere else in the world and it means this because it conveys an important and meaningful idea in political speech. The fact that you wish right-wing to be synonymous with paleo-conservative means that your definition of the term is *automatically wrong*. The purpose of different words in a language is to convey different concepts, not the same convenient concepts of your narrow-minded sterile ideology repeated over and over and over again.
I believed it for a minute...stupid, stupid me.
This is classic!
As if sushi wasn't fast food. Japanese are king of fast food. Of vending machine snacks. Bento, bento, Beard Papa's. And Ramen soup isn't exactly shy in calories.
Google proves themselves every year.  I think they deserver to be the one of the best company.  ATleast they provide us entertainment!!  wat ya say?
Then express it with a [shirt](http://paulkatcher.com/images/nascar_boring.jpg)
Considering recent conversations I've had with these sorts of people, it's hard to tell if this flash is fake or actually intended to be real.  If it weren't for the guy's tone of voice, I think the sarcasm would be impossible to detect.
That satire never gets old to me, never! And I too know people that would readily agree with what they heard after seeing that without a second thought of what was really happening.
Indeed, there are more factions in Iran than you can shake a stick at and they aree all shaking sticks at each other. That whole mess is ready to fly apart.
Wow - mapping your runs with Google Maps and the new Nike One Sphere. Incredible improvement to nikeplus.com &amp; the nike plus system
Duh.
In my opinion it's because in Europe they have a culture of eating healthy while in America it's more of a conscious choice for most people who do (At least it was for me, but that could have been because I was a fat kid) and in order to worry about eating healthy you have to not have to worry about the other stuff like making money.
Everyone in the world has GPS. It's an open system courtesy of the U.S. government.
See this?  ^^^^^^^  This is why I said that the legal semantics are the fascinating parts of this story.  Some news articles have been saying the police *are* treating this as a hate crime, other news articles are *not*.  The why questions, the law questions, how this would've been dealt with in America vs. Canada, that's the good stuff here.  And somehow pointing this out down below gets me downmodded 7 times?!  And what's with in another thread where I pointed out the sexism of a judicial ruling and got downmodded 54 times.  What the fuck is wrong with you people?
old, but freakin freakin FREAKIN genius
nice
&gt; Geisha are artists. They join the profession at the age of 15 and spend five years training as classical singers and dancers. I'm SO glad this is in there. It's so annoying that so many Westerners associate geisha first and foremost with prostitutes; the Japanese conception is very different. The first things you think of when you mention 'geisha' in Japan are 'refinedness', 'culture' and 'class', almost exactly the opposite of what one associates with prostitutes in the West. As for the rest of the article: is Lindsay Hawker the woman who was found murdered in a bathtub recently? I confess I do not see much of a threatening trend here. Whenever *anyone* gets murdered in Japan, it's headline news all over the country. Just imagine if that were true in the US! If Hawker had been killed in the West, even under those circumstances, it would hardly have been a blip on the radar.
Although I have limited knowledge of the subject, it is my understanding that Japan apologized... To the U.S. Korea, and possibly China, are still waiting on apologies. In other words, the Japanese apologized to who they had to, and no one else. Which leads me to believe that the apology may have been less than sincere. There is still a lot of denial with respect to the treatment of "comfort women" and the Japanese actions in Nanking. It's difficult to wrap your head around until you experience it firsthand, but most of East Asian society, be it Japanese, Chinese, or Korean, deeply distrust foreigners. Distrust that can border on xenephobia and manifest itself in pure race ideology (racism). A not insignificant portion of East Asian society believes that they are superior by virtue of their race. While racist ideas exist in North America as well, they are widely viewed as unacceptable, and their vocal proponents tend to be on the margins of society. Not so in East Asia. Now, this is changing. I don't see the same attitudes towards foreigners being perpetuated by the younger generation. They are more curious and and open to other cultures than their parents and grandparents. In a couple of generations, hopefully, a lot of the resentment and pure race ideas will have gone away. This brings me to a related point, and something I believe more and more ferverently the longer I live and travel abroad. I grew up in Canada and was taught, or possibly osmosed, the idea that North America (the U.S. more so than Canada) is a place with lots of race problems. Now, taking my travels in to consideration, I think that the U.S. (and Canada) is probably one of the least racist places on earth. North Americans should be proud of how well they get along, despite differences in race, religion, and culture.
For some reason you are ignoring the foreign fighters in Afghanistan and Iraq.
April Fool
I think you're missing the point. Especially since both the UK and Finland are right up there in lardness. The point is that American culinary culture sucks.
Good article, but have you read this guy's "Case for the Draft"? http://www.washingtonmonthly.com/features/2005/0503.carter.html In addition to a regular draft, he advocates a "21st Century" semi-draft, where no 4 year college or university be allowed to accept any student, male or female, unless that student signs up for a year of military service. That's ten different kinds of insane. Edit: He would allow them to fulfill it tutoring disadvantaged children. That's much better; now it's only two or three different kinds of insane. I almost like it.
April fools
No.
You're probably right, but grandparent still mixed up the median and mean.  He additionally assumed that the line between smart and dumb is at an IQ of 100. According to the [government](http://www.nsf.gov/statistics/seind02/c1/c1s2.htm),  &gt;The 1998 participation rates for geometry and calculus were 75 percent and 11 percent, respectively. Yes, it's higher today, but that means that around 10% of the population studied calculus.  Tell me with a straight face that fewer than 50% of Americans are idiots.
Type names are as ambiguous as any other symbol name.  (If only the semantics were well understood, we'd only have implementation bugs.) More seriously, good maintenance practices such as paying attention to locality of reference, encapsulation, and clear naming are at least as important in languages with static and manifest type systems as they are in languages with dynamic or latent type systems. Static and manifest typing may have other benefits, but I can think of very few cases in which manifest types demonstrated the intent of a piece of code as well as clarity of code did.
[Here's what I was talking about.](http://city.ask.com/city?msid=411267acf1bfcd85cffdacada10481f8&amp;msuserid=50182f146e16f16fcbcfd44461fa1f5e#1) Granted, there was a large plot of nothingness that was owned by the state department of corrections that recently got sold and is being developed into a neighborhood, so building a sidewalk along an empty field probably didn't make a lot of sense. Hopefully when they finish the neighborhood, they'll actually stick sidewalks in. Every time I have to get in my car to drive to the Wal-Mart down the street, I die a little inside.
So the internets really iz tubes!
I don't think Nascar is that bad but the shirt is pretty clever.
I think it depends alot on what you're up to. It's at least worth considering Guile. It's probably not a "proper" scheme, in many ways, but it integrates with C applications extremely well. And it's actively being worked on.
we are at an advantage biking in Vermont.  other parts of the country aren't as accepting of cyclists.  i think many drivers in fact despise the slower, man/woman-powered vehicles and act recklessly to get around them.
&gt; You'll read fewer junk comments on Reddit . . . This phrase recently spotted next to another comment whose sole text was &gt; PONIES!!1 I'm not so sure about that quality of comments thing, bub.
MY COUNTRY
If the road system were designed to move the most people, it would prioritize buses above everybody else, to the point of excluding all other traffic. In fact, it would have segregated light-rail. You know, you are by far the most ignorant-of-transportation-issues cyclist I have ever seen.
What a pathetic attempt at humour, you'd think with their billions they could have got a professional to come up with a better gag than this shit.
Me.
Furthermore, even highways are immune to local property taxes. Whereas train tracks *aren't*.
Read my other comments. The ones in this thread are simply admonitions. There's absolutely no reason I can't dispense these along with the other types. Australia, Korea, and Canada are all fairly nice about taking American immigrants, as far as I've been able to tell.
Robert Heinlein.
man if they can take the time to write flash animations about invisible people, imagine what kind of books and other literature they can make up with 2000 years:-p.
Hmm...  And what's the carbon footprint of the War on Iraq, mmm?
Damned Americans. You really have no idea how cities work outside of your little insular tin-pot country, do you?
Mass transit.
I'm the one who used we. I've only been able to vote for three years and haven't bought any property, so it's not really my fault things ended up this way. I used 'we' because it's going to take a hell of a lot of people to change things from the way they are, so I could either sit around whining about how 'they' messed everything up, or I can find like-minded people and try to fix things. You really should troll less. The only reason foreign cities are any different is because they were built before the automobile.
They didn't account for skull thickness when calculating BMI.
[Oooh yeah!!](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Death_Race_2000)
never going to happen.   usually, film is run at 24 frames per second and the cheapest film -8mm- is sold for about $10-14 for a 50' roll.  i'll let you do the math for 8mm frame/50' film/24 frames oer second.  it doesn't yield very much screen time.  100 frames per second would really kill ones budget and screen  time.  unless of course this is shot on video/dv and not film.  that's a different story...
The globalization of McDonalds, Subway, KFC, and Starbucks should even things out in the next 30 years.
From a simple standpoint of providing better presentation for the everyman, much of this article is good.  However, take certain examples: - point-to-point travel selection using maps instead of pulldowns.   The requires more bandwidth to present, and requires the user to know approximately where the locations are on a map (Americans are reportedly bad at locating countries, for example).  Having a text-based search available, which can then highlight the map location, would help those users. - The flower shop selector, using colored flowers instead of a pulldown of color names   A lie, if the official color name doesn't match the physical color.  This also requires the user to have normal color perception to pick correctly, particularly if picking for someone else.  Note that the flowers below, at least have both pictures AND names, addressing a similar issue.   
Italy (Italia) ,Florence (Firenze).  Down from Piazzale Michelangiolo , viale Galileo, to Galluzzo etc. ecc. Quite a shame but really cool.
Turn that 'often' into an 'always' and I'm with you. Though I don't credit Popper with any great insights. Feyerabend baby!
in statistics, you only need a small sample size to accurately represent the population.  for a study involving the WHOLE US you'd only need a few thousand people, upwards of 10000.  those people would need to be taken from all different sample spaces, but the numbers that the samples produce are extremely close to the real values.
Actually the $50 million dollars would be to pay other people to not emit carbon, so carbon emissions as a whole would go down.
Fuck the UN. Their resolutions are about as effective as wet paper bags, but better for wiping my ass with.
What's your view on KeyCompete?
Redditers really suck nowadays.
Download collection of Pink! ringtones to your cell phone.
I believe that eating fatty foods and not exercising is bad for me, yet I'm still going strong set in my ways.  Doesn't the world have enough bumper sticker slogans without you adding this one to the mix. Is Gore a hypocrite?  Yeah, same as me and probably most of us when it comes to issues of social concern.  That being said I don't think Gore is another poorly informed fair weather fan of the latest cause.  He's passionate on the subject and despite his own personal habits, is working to change the larger picture for the better.
Actually I have a hunch that IQ and gullibility are very loosely connected. I know a lot of smart people who are just not very skeptical especially when asked questions to which they've been conditioned to answer tactfully.
hey! they're both full of shit!
Yeah, it was in real life, Smart Guy. Every person I've ever known who was obese was eating at least twice as much as I do, and when they weren't eating they were talking about eating.
Do you have a link to the Cringely acticle?
I can understand a lot of what the article says, but if people agree with the article they must also agree with issues on gay marriage and sex with minors. Now I consider myself a liberal, and I do believe what you do in your own home and your own body is your business, but I have to play devil's advocate on this. If underage girls/boys consent to sex with older people if the government can no longer arrest you for doing drugs, it  can no longer also arrest people whom have had sex with a consenting underage minor. As it relates to gay marriage, if the government can no longer have any say in and lock people up for using drugs, it can no longer enforce the laws of gay marriage since they are two consenting adults and nobody's really getting hurt. My stance on those issues since I am a liberal are a firm yes. If you want to abuse drugs and you're not hurting anyone, you shouldn't be locked up for it. Gay marriage should be allowed, and for me, as long as the female minor I'm sleeping with is at least 17-meaning she's already been in a reproductive pubescent state for a few years, and can firmly make a reasonable decision-it should be allowed with  out me being locked up.
id like to know whos been looking at my myspace profile!!!
Victor Neiderhoffer has a point.
I'd abbreviate the headline thusly: "Slashdot's A... Joke"
It sounds very wasteful of energy
I think the biggest delusion both Theists and Atheists have is that they will listen to the same fucking bullshit over and over again, and they will love it EVERY SINGLE TIME. - PRAISE JESUS, AMEN!   - GOD ISN'T REAL! HAHA DUMB CHRISTIANS. I R SMART.
I should probably point out that I don't have a very high opinion of early Christians (and quite a few of the modern ones bug me a bit, too.) My point being, I don't care how many places the Bible condemns homosexuality.  I am abundantly aware that my disagreement is not with some all-knowing deity, but is instead with a group of men who lived 2000 years ago and whose idealogical descendants imprisoned Galileo.  Deferring my own good judgment to theirs doesn't seem like the best of ideas.
Some degree of affluence is a necessary but not sufficient condition for widespread obesity. I'm originally from Denmark, lived in the US for several years, and am now living in South Korea, and it's interesting to observe the difference in how people approach food. I frankly found the food culture in the US repulsive. Everything is super-sized: go to a typical restaurant (and many people these days eat out almost exclusively) and you get an enormous plate of fatty food accompanied by some kind of sugary bread and an endless free-refill stream of soft drinks. Most people seem to finish these grotesquely over-sized portions as a matter of habit; they equate being full with feeling bloated like a blimp. And what's more, everyone is so used to this state of affairs that they feel  short-changed if they _don't_ get giant servings that are sufficient in size to feed a small family. And I say all this as a food lover. I'm just not into American-style food porn. Sorry about the gross generalizations. I know it's far from accurate but I do think it contains a large degree of truth. My point is that the obesity in America has virtually nothing to do with affluence or "liking to eat".
I like the fact that they said they were going to pay for the postage with ads in 16 pt helvetica. That's a nice touch.
At least Bush released his record so people could know he went missing in the national guard, instead of being left in the dark with no clue of what he did in the military. What reason would Kerry have to not do this?
I know that I, like many other Americans, have behaved like a total buffoon, but we Americans are England's children. I know we don't call as often as we should and we aren't as well behaved as our goody-two-shoes brother Canada - who's never had a girlfriend (I'm just saying) - but please find it in your jewel-encrusted heart to forgive me
My rating has gone down from 300 to 292 in the past several hours. What would make this happen -- people downvoting existing stories, or submitting stories that don't get a lot of votes, or both? 
Raising someone as a Muslim falls under doing something good?
Of course, the dynamic language still tags all the values in the list, and inspects each tag dynamically (a runtime type check) in order to work out how to treat each value in the hlist. The Haskell example does exactly the same thing, but the tags are visible to the user (and under the user control). The runtime check/dynamic case: * *Upside* for the dynamic language is slightly less syntax to write heteogeneous lists  * *Downside* is that the runtime check still has to be made, even if you've got a list of objects all of the same type, leading to worse performance. For the statically typed language: * *Upside* is that the check can be removed when the type of each element in the list is known (as it usually is, in my experience). You also get a useful invariant (my list only holds 'a's), which can be used to improve reasoning.  * *Downside* is the extra syntax for tags when you do need a true heterogeneous list. Swings and roundabouts.
Indeed, it is a true heteogenous list. It is a list of values of varying type. The only difference is that the runtime tags are visible to the programmer, rather than being implicit.
Somebody needs to reply with the longest word in the English language.
Have you ever been to North Korea's website?  It's quite entertaining: http://www.korea-dpr.com/ Also of interest is their English-language news service found here: http://www.kcna.co.jp/index-e.htm  If I didn't know any better, I would have thought it was Saturday Night Live material.
[Now with a soundtrack](http://bushlovesitbald.ytmnd.com).
That's what Americans like to do. Always disclaim responsibility and find excuses. Has it occurred to you that the USA is *uniquely* fucked up among developed nations in that it consistently loathes all things collective? Mass transit, education, election politics, health care, antibiotics management, epidemiology protocols, emergency services, police, prisons, law, disaster planning, clean air, clean water, forests, fisheries, aquifer management, food purity, even nutrition standards. The USA fucks them all up exactly the way other low-trust societies (savage countries) fuck them up and high-trust societies (civilized countries) generally don't. Because the USA *hates* human beings. It's a psychopathological country where might makes right, what's mine is mine what's yours is mine, and there's no room for social justice. Or even society. Only so-called "civil" society promoted by the rich and properly domesticated to the furtherance of corporate control. And what do you know, yes cities are in fact collective endeavours. To say nothing of the fact that there's plenty of old cities or sections of cities that predated the automobile in the USA and what happened to them? They were demolished. As for your use of Us vs Them, nationalism (also known as Fascism in Europe) is despicable. So your use of "us" to denote Americans is contemptible all by itself, regardless of motivation. And if you really want to change things then you should first understand what *is*, what *could be*, what *should be* and what *will be*. And what *used to be* is going to come in handy. But the reason why I bring it up is because what *should be* excludes nationalism. If you're going to live the world you want to see, and if you're going to be a moral person, then you're going to have to junk nationalism overboard. Though I will grant you're already several steps ahead of [this guy](http://reddit.com/info/1e9pn/comments/c1edsc).
&gt; More April Fools jokes from Apple: I think you mean Google. ;-)
Oh, somehow the drought is (Democratic mayor of Indianapolis) Peterson's fault.  Oh, and that cactus growing over there, in the middle of a midwestern plain? Yep, it's 'cause we don't run them unnatural homosexuals out. The unnaturalness is spreading everywhere.   Hey, why aren't you two-steppin' like every other person in here? The sad thing is, I was talking about college-educated folks in the under-30 range from Chicagoland that chose to live there rather than deal with the inner-city crime. (That compared to where I grew up in Philadelphia, is non-existent in the neighborhoods they could afford.)
hi
Maybe karma is like money and inflation rises so its value shrinks.  Probably people downvoting old stories.  There is a lot of them that browser older stories now and again.
But if you're from Darfur it means that being beaten, raped and killed by people you never harmed is your fault for "thinking bad thoughts".  Yeay!
My understanding of it is that submitting is a neutral activity, upvotes are positive, and downvotes negative, regardless of the article they're attached to.  So an article's only going to get you degraded if it gets downvoted.
Because F# is a Microsoft language.
Due to the political and media importance given to it, this incident just can't be any representation of Iranian's treatment of captives in general, making the comparison unfair. Makes for a funny read, though.
The girl is like so freakin' hot, dude
I wonder out of all the talking heads who complain about "liberal Hollywood," how many of them have done as much to support the troops. Sometimes you have to go beyond rhetoric and yellow ribbons.
Sure, as long as you're not planning on storing it near where I live: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/NIMBY.
I've found it hard to believe to believe in Gore's sincerity ever since I read this:  http://www.snopes.com/politics/bush/house.asp
read www.realclimate.org for *scientific*  discussion of global warming.
They were complaining about trucks unloading and people opening their doors into the bike lane.  Putting the bike lane on the other side of the cars GUARANTEES that this will happen.  I'm not sure what this guy is thinking.
Hmm, when the guy pops the balloon with the pin, it's in front of him, but then they show it falling on his head? I suppose they could've just done two separate recordings. Thoughts?
good scientific information on global warming  at www.realclimate.org
this once a very nice song 
This particular bulb was actually shown briefly on a Mythbusters episode.  The reason it has lasted this long is that the filament is _huge_ and it is at a relatively low temp/lumens.  If you saw the bulb you would know why it was that we moved to hotter, thinner filaments that produce more light.
For real information on global warming, read  www.realclimate.org The kind of name calling in this article makes  the author look a lot worse than the targets.
Yes, it is not real, but extremely hiliarious.  Happy April Fool's Day!
The date on the article says March 1, 2007 so is the date part of an April Fools Joke?
Haskell [ghci 6.5]:  Prelude&gt; "4" + 4.0 &lt;interactive&gt;:1:6:   No instance for (Fractional [Char])  arising from the literal `4.0' at &lt;interactive&gt;:1:6-8   Possible fix: add an instance declaration for (Fractional [Char])   In the second argument of `(+)', namely `4.0'   In the expression: "4" + 4.0   In the definition of `it': it = "4" + 4.0 I got almost the exact same thing for "4" * 4.0 Short answer: Haskell doesn't treat strings as numbers by default, but if you wanted to you could.  Any valid definition would have to be associative in order to compile. Haskell has the ++ operator for concatenation.  An easy way to repeat a string (or any list) n times would be foldl ++ (replicate n list)
If you had actually read the article you would have noticed the paragraph where they note that the bulb has survived several firestation moves and two power outages.  It has not been burning continuously for 100+ years, but close as was possible given the conditions.
Bill O'Reilly is a little bitch, a little whiney bitch. I have yet to see him win an argument with reason or intelligence. It's always just bombast and rudeness.
The pet food recall is due to companies unwilling to spend the money for Quality Assurance.
There was a study a while back that claimed that people's reward centers (aspect of your brain) fire when their political beliefs are validated (or something like this).
I live in Tokyo. There's U.S.-style fast food everywhere. McDonalds, KFC, MosBurger (OK, not US but vaguely U.S. style), MisterDonuts. The main difference isn't the food it's the portion size. Most meals are 2/3 the size of what you'd get in the U.S.   McDonalds here got rid of the quarter pounder years ago because the Japanese find it to be too big.  Recently, KrispyKreme opened up a couple shops in Tokyo and people tell me that there are always lines in front but for now its benefiting from the curiosity value. It's been featured on a bunch of afternoon TV shows. I haven't been there myself but if they don't change the recipe I can't believe it'll succeed here. The Japanese always complain that American and British sweets are..well,...too sweet.  That's what happened to Cinnabon. Big booming first year, crash and burn in the second.
In this context we are talking about rural towns.  If you've got a lot of small farmers a rural town is probably going to be doing better than if you have one giant corporation (based in some big city) who owns all the farmland around. Aside from that, I haven't really given the issue a huge amount of thought and don't know that I would necessarily say that it would be better to subsidize smaller farms preferentially.  However, off the top of my head it seems like large farms (corporations) already have an unfair advantage in their ability to sway politics in their favor, to pressure deals to go their way (e.g. ADM price fixing), to hire high powered accounts to weasel their taxes as low as possible,  they don't have to pay estate tax that families do in case of inheritance, they are more likely to see land as a commodity rather than a home to be protected and preserved (not that smaller farmers haven't been selling out to developers plenty these days) and by the nature of such an operation (large and diverse crops) a large corporation should already have better insulation from market hiccups then a small farmer.
And from that page: &gt;Bollards are rigid posts that can be arranged in a line to close a road or path to vehicles above a certain width. Bollards can be mounted near enough to each other that they block ordinary cars, for instance, but wide enough to permit special-purpose vehicles through. Bollards can be used to enclose car-free zones: removable bollards allow access for service and emergency vehicles.
This should be damaging to America's sense of place in the world.   After everything we've done for the last 200+ years, and were still behind a long dead city-state in the popularity ranks.  At least were still more popular than Sex.  :-)
'The Secret' To Money, Relationships &amp; Health ..... It's so true !
Wow.
People downvoted your existing stories - up to approximately a day or two old. Beyond that, I believe time has little or no effect on the algorithm that calculates your karma.  Upset someone with your comments lately, perhaps?. 
Indeed.  Apparently [Forbes has had this bug for a while](http://www.google.com/search?q=HASH+site%3Aforbes.com). From the few that I looked at they are all Associated Press items.  Im guessing that the title contained a tailing apostrophe that broke their regexp.
By the way, you can't claim that Canadian cities are any older than American cities, even though it's clear that [Canadian cities are far more liveale](http://angrygeographer.typepad.com/the_angry_geographer/2006/08/5_things_canadi.html). Ha! And as for trolling, *someone* needs to remind Americans that they are hated.
Problems can be avoided by *using* guns. Owning a gun and not learning to use it properly is a joke. If you're not ready to use your gun you're not a real gun owner buddy.
If they're right (and they probably are), it's Perl we're talking about here.  Better not to ask questions as to the interworkings of this arcane language and interpreter.
if you actually took your head out of your ass you might be an OK person.
I'm surprised "Fuck" wasn't on the list, but maybe it is now that I went to see if Wikipedia did in fact have such a page.
I wonder how goog's doing right now...
Some of them are.  The smart ones figure out other parts of the system (Java and others) and explore and extend them.  The average developer working on my teams routinely works in two or three different programming languages, inclding scripting. The retards tend to wall themselves off and limit the scope of everything they do to a few tasks or a few subsystems, and bitch and moan a lot when they're asked to extend a bit beyond their comfort zone.  Those are the same people who are more worried about paying their mortgage than about doing a good job.  I found that the smart ones who love what they do focus on doing a great job because they understand that, if they do a great job, they *don't* have to worry about the mortgage. Cheers, E
I wonder if this would work better than a clock that took 1 minute off of your life, or if you make minimum wage 10 minutes.
Japan, Germany and Italy lost the war and are way down there compared to the US and UK which won. Coincidence? I think not!
"need to deal with their own Gay issues, before pointing over and saying hey look at those people over there." Muslim gays gladly say thank you for giving a fuck.   .....   ""God, we ask you to guide these lesbians to the true path."" That's it?  They have a religion to defend, and all they can come up with is some stupid signs with slogans? (/sarc)
The Ritz-Carlton Club and Residences, South Beach announced plans to develop an additional tower of wholly-owned residences on the west side of Collins Avenue and 29th Street. This 55-residence expansion marks a rare occurrence for a residential development on Miami Beach spanning from the Atlantic Ocean to Indian Creek. Three other residential towers, also part of the development, are being constructed along the ocean, including the historically preserved Seville Beach Hotel.
I find it interesting that the entire English-speaking world is way up there; Canada comes pretty close to the "15" mark, you'll notice.
The key statement in the article is as follows: "'Nearly two-thirds of online readers, once they chose a particular item to read, read all of text,' Quinn told Reuters on Thursday at the American Society of Newspaper Editors' annual conference where the study was released." Naturally, since the web user gets to do some pre-filtering of what kinds of stories are put in front of them, they are going to pay closer attention to their chosen selections.
can anyone say april fools... along with the GMail Paper Archive... Anyone else seen this. They will mail you for free any copy of any email unlimited pages, unlimited content... very suspicious
&gt;your default assumption seems to be that solar will be better than everything else Not at all. I'm merely arguing that it's naïve to write it off write already. it has been progressing, which at least indicates the *possibility* that it will one day be viable.
He's trying to, but he got in a tussle with zoning. http://www.foxnews.com/story/0,2933,259938,00.html
A step in the right direction,  however,  I disagree with the comment that follows the modified comics:  a professional scientist would not gladly substitute a fly, a frog or a mouse to a student if he can avoid it:  too much paperwork involved (all these pesky rules about experimenting on animals);  graduate students are much cheaper and easier to replace (though not necessarily as easy to train).
I believe it's Siouxsie Sioux.
OK, so i think you'll admit now that YouTube is no longer a video service...
Also in the same article incidents of "state terrorism have not been included" That would tip it back again.
Unfortunately, corn ethanol is not the best solution for alternate fuels.  But at least the farmer lobby will be happy with the extra government payments. As physist Gordon Prather wrote some time ago:   "America consumes about 133 billion gallons of gasoline a year. We currently convert a significant fraction of our corn crop into ethanol – about 2 billion gallons of ethanol per year – with which we make "gasohol" – a blend of 10 percent ethanol and 90 percent gasoline. Replacing the entire 133 billions of gasoline with a blend of 85 percent ethanol and 15 percent gasoline (E85) would apparently involve devoting all the ariable land in the United States to growing corn. "Think of it. Amber waves of corn, from sea to shining sea." Link: http://www.wnd.com/news/article.asp?ARTICLE_ID=31785
"A modest 512M"?! I run Eclipse all day with that much!
Actually it's a Microsoft Research language, and it's no different than any other language, only that it compiles to CIL, and can interface nicely with .NET.  It also works very well with Mono
You best not re-watch the last part of the video with that in mind then, the visualization could be pretty graphic.
What happens if my tubes are clogged?
2002-2004, woman has a face made for bukake
Here's the [reference you need](http://www.futurepundit.com/archives/003605.html), buddy. I was gonna give you Why Europeans Are Getting Taller And Taller And Americans Aren't. It made the vivid point that the Dutch used to be among the shortest people on Earth. Real pygmies. Look at them now! Only problem with that essay is the New Yorker pulled it off their site. Another reference is [this rather interesting claim about human longevity](http://www.fightaging.org/archives/001163.php) which says there's no statistical evidence for a maximum human lifespan. So Leatherboy is full of shit with his excuses for Americans being lard-asses.
I don't think that sushi is that bad for you. Isn't it just rice and some kind of vinegar? It's probably full of carbohydrates, but they can't be as bad as a meal that is full of fat. Volume plays into it too. Compare a bowl of ramen to a meal of hamburger, fries, and large Coke. Fast food joints have a mantra of more is better. Western food is preoccupied with saturated fats and sugar. When you combine that with an obsession with eating and it's not surprising that people are obese or overweight.
Great comment
reddit is not Digg. There are no descriptions here: you do it all in the title.
We are the children of the corn.   But seriously, corn based ethanol works but its better to use biomass and many other materials to do so (sugar etc).  Its not a whole solution but its a start on the piece of petroleum market.  WHat we really need is modular cars (probably battery) and pluggable energy types.  Using Petroleum alone is not to wise for competition or sustainability.
Maybe the editor chose a bad day to post it. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/HiPER http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Inertial_confinement_fusion
Don't you mean *American*? I'm really sick and tired of Americans claiming the "West" as the vassal slave provinces of their mighty empire. WE ARE NOT LIKE YOU. And WE FUCKING HATE YOU.
I tend to think Bush's home is so much more self-sufficient and "green" because the Bush family knows that industrial civilization is going to go utterly tits-up in the lifetime of most people currently living.  It's pure CYA, just like the home Bush purchased in Paraguay should he feel the need to flee the USA at some point for whatever reason.
According to http://hubel.sfasu.edu/research/survreslts.html , where they discuss the results, "green on yellow and white on fuchsia were ranked fairly low." Someone is bullshitting us.
Poetry and spam fornicated behind the bushes when no one was watching.
[An adult who has a BMI of 30 or higher is considered obese.](http://www.cdc.gov/nccdphp/dnpa/obesity/defining.htm)
This would probably be the *only* alarm clock that gets me up.
LMAO! Surely will get you laughing hard...
that's fucking mean.
thats right
Shh... you're disturbing the aura in the room. The other redditors can't mellow out with all this racket going on.
I guess you could say that Google's really going down the toilet.
It's not due to education but to moderating child abuse. Bible humpers come from an emotionally and psychologically (and usually physically) abusive environment. Cut that out and the whole movement comes to a screeching halt. That's what Boulder Colorado did. Or rather, that's what one very smart pediatrician did *to* Boulder.
Every text field in Mac OS X does this.  Hold down option.
I haven't actually been to Tokyo, and I didn't mean to imply that there were no fast food joints in Japan, but in my experience the fast foods joints are outnumbered by the more traditional eateries. I have only visited Japan relatively briefly and I made a point of avoiding western food places, so maybe my point of view is a little skewed. From what I saw the ramen shops were roughly equivalent to fast food stores. This is something you don't really have in western countries. If you want a cheap meal relatively quickly then you're forced to have something in burger form. As for Krispy Kreme, all I can say is "meh". I was seriously unimpressed when they arrived in Australia. To sweet, and other placed are much nicer for half the cost.
I meant the US and US-like countries. I'm Australian, but we have a similar infatuation to crap food as Americans.
This would be cooler if it was a video.
&gt; all hunter gatherer societies we know of average something like four hours a day of "work." A popular and untrue factoid.  Email Henry Harpending about this - he spent several years doing field work among the !Kung.  There are times when everyone scrabbles with every ounce of energy they have to keep from starving.  There are times when they fail.   
Just needs more information
We have quite a few of these in London now, and apart from making it more difficult for motorcyclists (me) to filter past traffic, they seem to be a godsend for cyclists. Pedestrians and motorists turning left across them have to be more vigilant, but even a crusty biker like me can see that they're a good idea. The case for seperation is well illustrated by this article: http://www.guardian.co.uk/transport/Story/0,2763,1222936,00.html where the lack of seperation and poor planning proved disastrous.
This site let's you freestyle online and collaborate with producers. Very nifty idea.
From what I can tell, the humor is all in the inherent funniness of toilets, with no additional reasons to laugh.
Well, Canadians don't. And Canadians have a hate-on for the USA to match Australians' hard-on for same. If it were technologically possible, Canada would have seceded from North American long ago. By the way, the proper term is Anglo-American countries though I personally use Anglo.
If you had to put up with stupid fucking guys all the time, you'd age quickly too.
Reducing emissions is *always* better than purchasing offsets.   I'm honestly surprised at this article.
April Foool!
You should get a:  1. Sense of humor  2. Life
I watch Colbert oodles more than I watch O'Reilly, so when you see Papa Bear in action you really see that Colbert isn't being absurd in his satire - he really is just emulating his man. I really do pity the millions of people who watch that as their news.
What's more frightening is that a third of those surveyed think religion doesn't have ENOUGH influence in politics, and another third think that the current amount is right.  The problem is not whether half of Americans reject evolution...the problem is whether they think everyone else should reject it as well.
Or should I say April Foul :-)
It's funny coz it's true!
&gt; Python "dynamic but strong" typing:  &gt;&gt;&gt; 4 * '4.0'   '4.04.04.04.0'   &gt;&gt;&gt; 4 * 4.0 * 4L * (4+0j)   (256+0j) No, Haskell isn't strong enough to avoid the second -- but O'Caml is, and even C is: you can't possibly use `*` there without explicit conversion from your user-defined types in C.
&gt;TiSP for Enterprise  &gt;  &gt;We're actively developing a higher-performance version of TiSP specifically tailored to small and medium-sized businesses, including 24-hour, on-site technical support in the event of backup problems, brownouts and data wipes.
She didn't say anything new here.  In fact, I did not get the impression that she understands Japanese society herself.  
Before?  Maybe. After reading this article?  no freaking way!
I was never a Slashdot discussion participant, just a reader, but my impression is that not sorting by date is one of reddit's biggest wins. I wouldn't mind having a small bio block on reddit, perhaps like the Amazon one, with a pic and opportunity to link to your blog, etc. (maybe even without a nofollow, if you have enough karma!)
Google / Apple merge - that would be a crazy april fools prank...
That was $50 Billion, not million. And that assumes that someone around the world is willing to cut their carbon emissions by $50Billion worth.  It's not the Europeans, it's not the Americans, and it certainly won't be the Chinese or Indians or Australians then who will it be?
Well, we had some girl scouts coming to campus, so they were just standing in the cafeteria selling their cookies...  Not much difference to the grocery store there.
I really like this idea.
You want counterpoint to that idiocy? Being a nazi line soldier was not a war crime. Participating to war crimes was. How many german soldiers that were on the front lines and didn't participate to war crimes you know were sued for that or even worse holded forever at some legal black hole?  Do you even understand why Geneva convention was initially created?
And hopefully also Saudi-funded teaching material used in London Islamic schools (also Saudi-funded) that call Jews 'apes' and Christians 'pigs'. This is being thaught to children as young as five. One has to wonder what else they might be thaught about the society (Britain) they live in.   http://www.thisislondon.co.uk/news/article-23384657-details/We+do+use+books+that+call+Jews+'apes'+admits+head+of+Islamic+school/article.do
Those are sheep. No, seriously. In certain Mac bitmap fonts (no longer used—OS X only supports outline fonts), ÿ is a different glyph altogether. IIRC, Geneva 9 had the sheep, whereas New York and Monaco [Edit: Apparently not Monaco] had other things. \[Added\] Full list on [this page](http://catless.ncl.ac.uk/risks/18.13.html). Do a Find for “sheep”. There are more than I knew about.
He's not doing jumping jacks.  He's so fat his arms and legs are stuck in that position.
Ok, let me bite. Yes, German politics are retarded.  It's stupid that we subsidize both nukilar power, coal mining, and "green" energy production.  If we stopped that, it would be cheaper (in taxes/debt), and people would actually try to save energy to save money. But nevermind it's *us Germans*.  By that measure *you Americans* are an even more stupid, warmongering nation that has huge problems with just about everything.  Yeah, let's just not generalize, cause that makes *you* look fucking retarded as well. The rest of your post is just a lot of flaming and things you believe that I won't even bother to answer.
&gt; It will screw up some web pages (not many) but you can easily switch it off or open up those pages in a different browser. Even better, [OmniWeb](http://omnigroup.com/applications/omniweb/) has a “Site Preferences” feature that lets me add further overrides (different size multiplier, different image-loading prefs, etc.) for a specific site.
Such is the heavy price of progress.  China wants to be the manufacturing floor of the world and build up their cities so they can provide a decent standard of living to its people.  They're likely reasoning that they can fix the environment later after they've taken care of the 'development' problem first.  Hopefully, by the time they get back around to the environment there will still be breathable air and potable water.
For the same reason you can vote here. Equality.
Bill O'Reilly acted like an asshole?! SAY IT AIN'T SO!
&gt; but the problem is NOT that you can't create 100000 Threads easily in Java. If you can't reasonably implement a concurrent solution almost all of the time with a technology, it's absurd to raise that technology in terms of 'real concurrency' over others which you can so use. 
[This one](http://gizmodo.com/gadgets/gadgets/the-latest-in-advertising-technology-166598.php) is better.
Heh. :-) Well, now it's back to 0.  Maybe I should remove my (+)... BTW, JEdit cured my Emacs addiction, thanks for that.
&gt; but apparently the JVM sucked so bad at it they went with a Java Thread -&gt; Native Thread mapping model. Heh!  Sound like the path of another popular language, to you?
sharing vintage graphic here
&gt; Green text on yellow works the best. But looks the worst.
cool!
Dunno where *you* live.  I can buy Pepsi, Coke, Afri Cola, or I can buy cheap Sam's Cola, River Cola, and other cheaper brands that I actually like - and for the price they're simply great. You also know you can make your own lemonade if you care?  I don't care enough and I drink more water and juice, but I don't think soft drinks are very much overpriced. Oil?  Maybe, but it's dependent on supply and demand as well. Printer ink?  In my town they have "printer recharging" stores, *several* of them.  On ebay you can buy a dozen cartridges for maybe 15 bucks.  That'll last thousands of pages.
Ahhh yes, I love deliberate stupidity. &gt; Is this all evidence of a schizophrenic society: glossy and glitzy on the surface, but with dark, disturbing and dangerous undercurrents? I don't think so. followed soon after with: &gt; Tatemae is the face you present to society, the way society expects you to behave. Japanese people always understand, when someone says or does something, that they may be merely expressing tatemae. It may well not be what they really think or feel. Which is *exactly* what is colloquially understood by schizophrenia. Oh and pretty much any psychologist is going to tell you based on the description in this article that Japanese society is sick. Sick, sick sickety sick.
thats not how language is created or evolves look at animals - they make sounds that mean things. slowly the sounds become standardized and various
Weak even by /. standards...
Scheme48 is nice and small, and written in Scheme itself.  Even its VM is written in a Scheme dialect (similar to Squeak, which is written is some Smalltalk dialect). PLT is maybe *the* standard, but I always found it a bit ugly.  Also, IIRC, it has conservative GC, not a precise one, which I don't like. Chicken seems to rock.  Lots of eggs, lots of features; really a stunning project.  And it can compile and has a REPL as well.
I disagree with 1) "let's just not generalize" and 2) all mentions of me being an American. HAHAHA. Other than that, yes Americans are fucked up. By the way, Italy tried to not build any power plants but instead "save energy". They have some of the highest electricity rates in Europe because they have to import massive amounts of it. Your plan is not bad in that it would immediately kill off both the "green" and the coal industries. Except your motivation for that plan is retarded. Society isn't going to tolerate mass deaths and that's the only thing that will "save energy".
Matt Cutts, our trusty Google friend has had his site hacked by a bunch of black hat SEO’s. Here’s the screen shot below:
Ha ha, so clever -- it's a *picture* of a space station! *Knee-slap*
Shit like this is so fucking retarded.  Do you assholes ever get tired of posting this shit?
the onus is on you
Let me guess, you’ve never visited Europe?
GP magazine
you can leave your friends behind...
To be fair, it is quite common to clear your cellphone bill by paying with broccoli. You're just not hip with the kids, daddy-o.
Hey! Snooker is awsome! ;)
Why has no one mentioned that Gore pays a premium to get his electricity from Solar, Wind, Methane and other renewable sources? So yes, his house uses a lot of power, but that's only half the story here. The other half: http://www.snopes.com/politics/business/gorehome.asp
Well, it's old for sure.
Downvoted 'cause it's jacked from the xkcd guy.
It's alway a grim reminder to know that China will became the most polluting state in the world around the year 2009.
Yet there's no mention of xkcd where this image is taken from. Go here instead:  http://www.xkcd.net/c77.html
I'm Canadian too and You're full of crap. Canadians LOOOOOVE things American. As a Canadian myself I'll point out the dirty little secret of being Canadian. The reason Canadians tend to be so smug and sanctimonious and superior is that we think that being Canadian entitles us to everything in the shop window of American culture: all the movies, music and TV shows; the same cars, the same shops and the same fast food; the same clothes and the same houses without the time lag of those Euro and Auzzie suckers. But Canadians don't want EVERYTHING American. Being Canadian entitles us to pick and choose. we don't have to invest in a real military because we know the U.S. (out of self-interest, not because they're nice guys) will always protect us. So Canada engaged in a lot of 'social loafing' in the Cold War. This also allows Canada to concentrate on 'peace keeping' since its the one use of the military that feminists and socialists will agree to. And Canadians want socialized medicine because its cheaper. And if you have a real urgent health problem and you don't want to wait 5 months for surgery in Canada you just mortgage your house and get it done in the U.S. Best of both worlds!!! Thanks America!! Oh, yeah, and gun control.  Of course gun control doesn't make Canada unique in the world. Only different from the U.S. But that's all most Canadian nationalists care about; Pretending we're different from Americans. That's the difference between Anglo-Canada and the U.S. states north of the Mason-Dixon line: small, ineffective military, socialized medicine and gun control. And if the U.S. north of the Mason-Dixon line had things their way they'd have things just the way Canada does. So when it comes to differences between Canadians and Americans of the northern states the differences are pretty hard to find. 
Ok maybe I'm reading this wrong, but according to that page it says that 27% of atheists/agnostics feel that evolution was god guided and 13% are creationist?! Maybe Deists are using that option. Who knows.
Ahhh yes, I'm going to let a right-wing conservative tell me what being Canadian is all about. Piss off.
I don't pity them, I say we exterminate them for the betterment of mankind. These people are a pimple on the human race's ass.
There's also a [product page](http://www.thinkgeek.com/stuff/41/wiihelm.shtml) for you to read.
...Source?
Well don't say you're speaking for all Canadians. You aren't. And I'll piss off when I want to. Or are you going to sic a human rights tribunal on me for saying something you don't like?   And I don't see you disputing anything I wrote.
That has to be the shittiest broadband service ever.
&gt; As for your point, you admit it's all a model. Is this your novel attack on evolution? "It's just a model"? Every scientific theory about the real world is "just" a model. Even a perfectly descriptive theory of the real world would still be "just" a model.
&gt; Due to the political and media importance given to it, this incident just can't be any representation of Iranian's treatment of captives in general, Indeed, it's a highly disinformational comparison.
The United States does not have an official language.  Had history turned out just a bit differently than it did, the main spoken language in the US would have been German and not English.  Unfortunately, as more and more languages are being used in the US, society is becoming less cohesive.  Maybe making English the official language would solve the problem, but I suspect that would cause a number of unanticipated problems of its own.
"Within sixty minutes -- assuming proper data flow -- the other end of your fiber-optic cable should have reached the nearest TiSP Access Node, where our Plumbing Hardware Dispatchers (PHDs) will remove the sinker and plug the line into our global data networking system." This makes me giggle. Oh PHD's :P
Yes, that is what I am implying and I do so to make a case for criticism of the politics here in Japan.  Though the apparatus of democracy is present the function of the government is not democratic.  This has roots in the culture that were not overturned by MacArthur and the provisional government--how could they, really?   At any rate, there is plenty of literature on this subject and I hope you would look into it if you are really interested.
&gt; The iranians probably didn't have a clue to where exactly they were. No, you're clueless.  About GPS, about what the Republican Guard thought, and about the waterway in question -- which defies most argument about national waters.
Thank you so much for admitting what you are. This makes this much, MUCH easier. Here's the political spectrum:                     v you are here v    COMMUNISTS / ANARCHISTS SOCIALISTS SOCIAL-DEMOCRATS (NDP) LIBERALS CONSERVATIVES FASCISTS The USA's official ideologies are restricted to Conservatism and Fascism. Canada's political parties span everything from social democracy to conservatism. Because you're an idiot and a conservative, you think there's no meaningful difference between yourself (the most right-wing part of Canada) and the North Eastern USA (the most left-wing part of the USA). As is clear by now, YOU ARE A FUCKING IDIOT.
how did this crap get to the front page? there is no god!!! ahhh
how did this crap get to the front page? there is no god!!! ahhh
Well, Dick sounds like an American name, that's why I thought you were one.  But it doesn't matter if you're Polish, Czech, or whatever. If you feel your country is so much better than all others, and that your politicians are not fucked up in the head, be happy with that.
What you fail to realize is that the entire question of Al Gore's hypocrisy is an irrelevant tangent to, and distraction from, the question of Global Warming. The existence of the former does not disprove the existence of the latter.
How long ago was this?
yeah, definitely true!
Africans... no wait, they have nothing to cut.
You'll see ( define cube (lambda (x) (* x x x))) used in books for beginners. It stresses that (lambda (x) (* x x x)) evaluates to a *value*, which is an important fact to learn.  It's a little long though, so eventually you'll begin to write: ( define (cube x) (* x x x) ) instead.
Looks like Little Richie got himself an intro poli-sci textbook and thinks he knows everything there is to know. Why don't you go to your Free Mumia Now!! rally and I'll catch up with you when you join the real world and find out that real individual human beings don't correspond to the abstractions in textbooks.  BTW, the political spectrum you demonstrate has long been discredited. The more contemporary view is more of a circle of freedom showing little difference between Communist and fascist totalitarians. 
&gt; the Iranians are doing far less unpleasant things to their captives than the US and Britain have consistently done to theirs. Which is nonsense made palatable by one completely fucked-up and unjustifiable situation, and then by Gitmo.  The US and Britain do not have a consistent unpleasancy to point to as regards foreign militaries.
comedy
Pick DrScheme. A great effort has gone into producing readable error messages and well-written documentation. Both are very important when you are learning a new language.  Then later try the various Scheme implementations again, each has its strength and weaknesses. 
&gt; This looks like another "Gulf of Tonkin" incident Why?  Because it involves ships of some kind?  And water of some kind?
Are you kidding me? I'm more cynical about Canada than the most cynical embittered German could be about Hitler's Germany. The difference is that I live maybe 50 kilometers from the most powerful evil empire in human history. So I know all about how NOT great "markets" and "competition" are. If public health care sucks, and it does, then fix it. Because *there is no alternative!*
&gt; Terry Jones brilliantly says what so many are thinking. Repeating the disinformed impressions of shallow-thinking people is no great feat, even if you do it well.
I'd like to address this post to the girls, who can't imagine their life without their pet and best friend - their iPod.
I wouldnt call GPS an open system.   and "courtesy of the U.S. government" makes it sound like they are doing something friendly and altruistic! the US military owns GPS, and they can and do turn if off in certain areas where it suits them (ie screw up their enemy)
I would not say mostly genetic. Don't forget that the US population is made up of people from many other parts of the world. I think the real reasons are not so hard to spot; subsidised food production, rampant consumerism leading to lots of innovation and effort in food marketing, and great reliance on cars and other labour-saving technologies spring to mind.
&gt; [Iran is] certainly winning the propaganda war I can think of one very important propaganda war -- the one waged by North Vietnam, in concert with a tenacious ground campaign and under not-insignificant shielding by Cold War politics.  North Vietnam propaganda efforts went much farther than this 'war' you identify, and it took much longer to fight, and a result of it is that the US in particular is still very much immunized against a repetition of some of the roles it played. But OK, 'winning the propaganda war'.  I only have the NV example, can you give me one that makes the action of Iran's more warlike, and not desperate politics?
I would have built an organic soybean sputum fort decorated with advertisements.
&gt; [[Iran is]] certainly winning the propaganda war I can think of one very important propaganda war -- the one waged by North Vietnam, in concert with a tenacious ground campaign and under not-insignificant shielding by Cold War politics.  North Vietnam propaganda efforts went much farther than this 'war' you identify, and it took much longer to fight, and a result of it is that the US in particular is still very much immunized against a repetition of some of the roles it played. But OK, 'winning the propaganda war'.  I only have the NV example, can you give me one that makes the action of Iran's more warlike, and not desperate politics? EDIT: ... Dear reddit: What the fuck?
Is that the crap propagated by you idiotic hard right-wingers?
That's not true at all. Good workout is absolutely necessary to lose weight.
Can anybody tell me the name of the psychological condition that Mr O'Reilly is suffering from? Or maybe his brain is somehow damaged? Shouldn't people like him be locked away? (Yes, go ahead, picture him in a straight-jacket!)
[Here's](http://www.michaelhanscom.com/eclecticism/2004/01/21/march-of-the-sinister-ducks) what you should all have listened to years ago if this picture was a suprise. (via [Neil Gaiman](http://www.neilgaiman.com/journal/2004/01/you-think-theyre-cuddly-but-i-think.asp)) (It's on Google if you look hard enough).
Well, I didn't laugh but at least it gave me the oppurtunity to find out what "redacted" means. Edit: oh, I see, it cencors specific words. Now, let's see, haskell, god and religion.
Interviewee's main point: By using private mercenaries, the Bush administration is allegedly subverting the democratic process in the US and in other countries of the world (where mercenary companies gather their recruits).  At least he's honest enough to admit that the current Iraq war could not be fought without the hired contractors. The author clearly has an agenda of counteracting what he calls the privatization of what services that have been provided by the US government.  As such, the claims in his book are somewhat suspect to me until I've had a chance to look at it more closely.
You obviously need to watch The Office :P
Well, that's it! I'm switching to Digg. Edit: Err, D i g g, you censors! Edit: I said c e n s o r s! Edit: They stopped censoring...
After not reading a slashdot story in several months, I'm officially removing them from by "Faves" so I don't have to look at them ever again.
Why not just make an alarm clock with no snooze button?
